Mrs. Fidget
,—"THERE, MR. FIDGET, 
I
 TOLD YOU HOW IT WOULD BE!—WE HAVE MISSED THE TRAIN.—NOW, I HOPE YOU ARE SATISFIED!"
Mr. Fidget
,—"BUT, MY DEAR, IT LACKS FIVE MINUTES OF THE HOUR BY MY WATCH."
Mrs. Fidget
,—"BY YOUR, FIDDLE-DE-DEE, STUFF AND NONSENSE. A TRUMPERY, FOREIGN AFFAIR, THAT IS NEVER CORRECT. WHY DON'T YOU GET A GOOD "
HOWARD WATCH
," MR. FIDGET, AND THEN WE SHALL KNOW WHAT WE ARE ABOUT?"
(
N. B.—Mr. F. resolves that he will take Mrs. F.'s advice
.)
A CURIOUS DREAM.
CONTAINING A MORAL.
MARK TWAIN.
NIGHT before last I had a singular dream. I seemed to be sitting on a doorstep (in no particular city, perhaps), ruminating, and the time of night appeared to be about twelve or one o'clock. The weather was balmy and delicious. There was no human sound in the air, not even a footstep. There was no sound of any kind to emphasize the dead stillness, except the occasional hollow barking of a dog in the distance and the fainter answer of a further dog. Presently up the street I heard a bony clack-clacking, and guessed it was the castanets of a serenading party. In a minute more a tall skeleton, hooded, and half clad in a tattered and mouldy shroud whose shreds were flapping about the ribby lattice-work of its person, swung by me with a stately stride, and disappeared in the gray gloom of the starlight. It had a broken and worm-eaten coffin on its shoulder and a bundle of something in its hand. I knew what the clack-clacking was then; it was this party's joints working together, and his elbows knocking against his sides as he walked. I may say I was surprised. Before I could collect my thoughts and enter upon any speculations as to what this apparition might portend, I heard another one coming—for I recognised his clack-clack. He had two-thirds of a coffin on his shoulder, and some foot- and head-boards under his arm. I mightily wanted to peer under his hood and speak to him, but when he turned and smiled upon me with his cavernous sockets and his projecting grin as he went by, I thought I would not detain him. He was hardly gone when I heard the clacking again, and another one issued from the shadowy half-light. This one was bending under a heavy gravestone, and dragging a shabby coffin after him by a string. When he got to me he gave me a steady look for a moment or two, and then rounded to and backed up to me, saying:
"Ease this down for a fellow, will you?"
I eased the gravestone down till it rested on the ground, and in doing so noticed that it bore the name of "John Baxter Copmanhurst," with "May, 1839," as the date of his death. Deceased sat wearily down by me, and wiped his os frontis with his major maxillary—chiefly from former habit I judged, for I could not see that he brought away any perspiration.
"It is too bad, too bad," said he, drawing the remnant of the shroud about him and leaning his jaw pensively on his hand. Then he put his left foot up on his knee and fell to scratching his ankle bone absently with a rusty nail which he got out of his coffin.
"What is too bad, friend?"
"Oh, everything, everything. I almost wish I never had died."
"You surprise me. Why do you say this? Has anything gone wrong? What is the matter?"
"Matter! Look at this shroud—rags. Look at this gravestone, all battered up. Look at that disgraceful old coffin. All a man's property going to ruin and destruction before his eyes, and ask him if anything is wrong? Fire and brimstone!"
"Calm yourself, calm yourself," I said. "It 
is
 too bad—it is certainly too bad, but then I had not supposed that you would much mind such matters, situated as you are."
"Well, my dear sir, I 
do
 mind them. My pride is hurt, and my comfort is impaired—destroyed, I might say. I will state my case—I will put it to you in such a way that you can comprehend it, if you will let me," said the poor skeleton, tilting the hood of his shroud back, as if he were clearing for action, and thus unconsciously giving himself a jaunty and festive air very much at variance with the grave character of his position in life—so to speak—and in prominent contrast with his distressful mood.
"Proceed," said I.
"I reside in the shameful old graveyard a block or two above you here, in this street—there, now, I just expected that cartilage would let go!—third rib from the bottom, friend, hitch the end of it to my spine with a string, if you have got such a thing about you, though a bit of silver wire is a deal pleasanter, and more durable and becoming, if one keeps it polished—to think of shedding out and going to pieces in this way, just on account of the indifference and neglect of one's posterity!"—and the poor ghost grated his teeth in a way that gave me a wrench and a shiver—for the effect is mightily increased by the absence of muffling flesh and cuticle. "I reside in that old graveyard, and have for these thirty years; and I tell you things are changed since I first laid this old tired frame there, and turned over, and stretched out for a long sleep, with a delicious sense upon me of being 
done
 with bother, and grief, and anxiety, and doubt, and fear. for ever and ever, and listening with comfortable and increasing satisfaction to the sexton's work, from the startling clatter of his first spadeful on my coffin till it dulled away to the faint patting that shaped the roof of my new home—delicious! My! I wish you could try it to-night!" and out of my reverie deceased fetched me with a rattling slap with a bony hand.
"Yes, sir, thirty years ago I laid me down there, and was happy. For it was out in the country, then—out in the breezy, flowery, grand old woods, and the lazy winds gossiped with the leaves, and the squirrels capered over us and around us, and the creeping things visited us, and the birds filled the tranquil solitude with music. Ah, it was worth ten years of a man's life to be dead then! Everything was pleasant. I was in a good neighborhood, for all the dead people that lived near me belonged to the best families in the city. Our posterity appeared to think the world of us. They kept our graves in the very best condition; the fences were alway in faultless repair, head-boards were kept painted or whitewashed, and were replaced with new ones as soon as they began to look rusty or decayed; monuments were kept upright, railings intact and bright, the rosebushes and shrubbery trimmed, trained, and free from blemish, the walks clean and smooth and gravelled. But that day is gone by. Our descendants have forgotten us. My grandson lives in a stately house built with money made by these old hands of mine, and I sleep in a neglected grave with invading vermin that gnaw my shroud to build them nests withal! I and friends that lie with me founded and secured the prosperity of this fine city, and the stately bantling of our loves leaves us to rot in a dilapidated cemetery
A MIND AT REST.
Nervous Thin Man
.—"IT SEEMS THAT THIS TRAIN IS BEHIND TIME, SIR; WE ARE MAKING NEARLY A MILE A MINUTE."
Choleric Fat Man
.—"WELL, WHAT OF IT?"
Nervous Man
.—"RATHER DANGEROUS! SOME ONE SHOULD SPEAK TO THE CONDUCTOR."
Choleric Man
."—"NOT I, SIR! I HAVE A $5.000 ACCIDENT POLICY IN THE 'TRAVELERS';' AND DON'T INTEND TO EXERT MYSELF IN THE INTERESTS OF ANY CORPORATION."
 which neighbors curse and strangers scoff at. See the difference between the old time and this, for instance. Our graves are all caved in, now; our head-boards have rotted away and tumbled down; our railings reel this way and that, with one foot in the air, after a fashion of unseemly levity; our monuments lean wearily, and our grave stones bow their heads discouraged; there be no adornments any more—no roses, nor shrubs, nor gravelled walks nor anything that is a comfort to the eye, and even the paintless old board fence that did make a show of holding us sacred from companionship with beasts and the defilement of heedless feet, has tottered till it overhangs the street, and only advertises the presence of our dismal resting-place and invites yet more derision to it. And now we cannot hide our poverty and tatters in the friendly woods, for the city has stretched its withering arms abroad and taken us in, and all that remains of the cheer of our old home is the cluster of lugubrious forest trees that stand, bored and weary of city life, with their feet in our coffins, looking into the hazy distance and wishing they were there. I tell you it is disgraceful!
"You begin to comprehend—you begin to see how it is. While our descendants are living sumptuously on our money, right around us in the city, we have to fight hard to keep skull and bones together. Bless you, there isn't a grave in our cemetery that doesn't leak—not one. Every time it rains in the night we have to climb out and roost in the trees—and sometimes we are awakened suddenly by the chilly water trickling down the back of our necks. Then I tell you there is a general heaving up of old graves and kicking over of old monuments, and scampering of old skeletons for the trees! Bless me, if you had gone along there some such nights after twelve you might have seen as many as fifteen of us roosting on one limb, with our joints rattling drearily and the wind wheezing through our ribs! Many a time we have perched there for three or four dreary hours, and then come down, stiff and chilled through and drowsy, and borrowed each other's skulls to bale out our graves with—if you will glance up in my mouth, now as I tilt my head back, you can see that my head-piece is half full of old dry sediment—how top-heavy and stupid it makes me sometimes! Yes, sir, many a time if you had happened to come along just before the dawn you'd have caught us baling out the graves and hanging out our shrouds on the fence to dry. Why, I had an elegant shroud stolen from there one morning—think a party by the name of Smith took it, that resides in a plebeian graveyard over yonder—I think so because the first time I ever saw him he hadn't anything on but a check-shirt, and the last time I saw him, which was at a social gathering in the new cemetery, he was the best dressed corpse in the company—and it is a significant fact that he left when he saw me; and presently an old women from here missed her coffin—she generally took it with her when she went anywhere, because she was liable to take cold and bring on the spasmodic rheumatism that originally killed her if she exposed herself to the night air much. She was named Hotchkiss—Anna Matilda Hotchkiss—You might know her? She has two upper front teeth, is tall, but a good deal inclined to stoop, one rib on the left side gone, has one shred of rusty hair hanging from the left side of her head, and one little tuft just above and a little forward of her right ear, has her under jaw wired on one side where it had worked loose, small bone of left forearm gone—lost in a fight—has a kind of swagger in her gait and a 'gallus' way of going with her arms akimbo and her nostrils in the air—has been pretty free and easy, and is all damaged and battered
 up till she looks like a queensware crate in ruins—maybe you have met her?"
"God forbid!" I involuntarily ejaculated, for somehow I was not looking for that form of question, and it caught me a little off my guard. But I hastened to make amends for my rudeness and say, "I simply meant I had not had the honour—for I would not deliberately speak discourteously of a friend of yours. You were saying that you were robbed—and it was a shame, too—but it appears by what is left of the shroud you have on that it was a costly one in its day. How did—"
A most ghastly expression began to develop among the decayed features and shrivelled integuments of my guest's face, and I was beginning to grow uneasy and distressed, when he told me he was only working up a deep, sly smile, with a wink in it, to suggest that about the time he acquired his present garment a ghost in a neighboring cemetery missed one. This reassured me, but I begged him to confine himself to speech thenceforth, because his facial expression was uncertain. Even with the most elaborate care it was liable to miss fire. Smiling should especially be avoided. What 
he
 might honestly consider a shining success was likely to strike me in a very different light. I said I liked to see a skeleton cheerful, even decorously playful, but I did not think smiling was a skeleton's best hold.
"Yes, friend," said the poor skeleton, "the facts are just as I have given them to you. Two of these old graveyards—the one that I resided in and one futher along—have been deliberately neglected by our descendants of to-day until there is no occupying them any longer. Aside from the osteological discomfort of it—and that is no light matter this rainy weather—the present state of things is ruinous to property. We have got to move or be content to see our effects wasted away and utterly destroyed. Now you will hardly believe it, but it is true nevertheless, that there isn't a single coffin in good repair among all my acquaintance—now that is an absolute fact. I do not refer to low people who come in a pine box mounted on an express wagon, but I am talking about your high-toned, silver-mounted burial-case, monumental sort, that travel under black plumes at the head of a procession and have choice of cemetery lots—I mean folks like the Jarvises, and the Bledsoes and Burlings, and such. They are all about ruined. The most substantial people in our set, they were. And now look at them—utterly used up and poverty-stricken. One of the Bledsoes actually traded his monument to a late barkeeper for some fresh shavings to put under his head. I tell you it speaks volumes, for there is nothing a corpse takes so much pride in as his monument. He loves to read the inscription. He comes after awhile to believe what it says himself, and then you may see him sitting on the fence night after night enjoying it. Epitaphs are cheap, and they do a poor chap a world of good after he is dead, especially if he had hard luck while he was alive. I wish they were used more. Now I don't complain, but confidentially I 
do
 think it was a little shabby in my descendants to give me nothing but this old slab of a gravestone—and all the more that there isn't a compliment on it. It used to have 
'GONE TO HIS JUST REWARD'
 on it, and I was proud when I first saw it, but by-and-by I noticed that whenever an old friend of mine came along he would hook his chin on the railing and pull a long face and read along down till he came to that, and
 then he would chuckle to himself and walk off, looking satisfied and comfortable. So I scratched it off to get rid of those fools. But a dead man always takes a deal of pride in his monument. Yonder goes half-a-dozen of the Jarvises, now, with the family monument along. And Smithers and some hired spectres went by with his a while ago. Hello, Higgins, good-by, old friend! That's Meredith Higgins—died in '44—belongs to our set in the cemetery—fine old family—great-grand-mother was an Injun—I am on the most familiar terms with him—he didn't hear me was the reason he didn't answer. And I am sorry, too, because I would have liked to introduce you. You would admire him. He is the most disjointed, sway-backed, and generally distorted old skeleton you ever saw, but he is full of fun. When he laughs it sounds like rasping two stones together, and he always starts it off with a cheery screech like raking a nail across a window-pane. Hey, Jones! That is old Columbus Jones—shroud cost four hundred dollars—entire trousseau, including monument, twenty-seven hundred. This was in the spring of '26. It was enormous style for those days. Dead people came all the way from the Alleghanies to see his things—the party that occupied the grave next to mine remembers it well. Now do you see that individual going along with a piece of a head-board under his arm, one leg-bone below his knee gone, and not a thing in the world on? That is Barstow Dalhouse, and next to Columbus Jones he was the most sumptuously outfitted person that ever entered our cemetery. We are all leaving. We cannot tolerate the treatment we are receiving at the hands of our descendants. They open new cemeteries, but they leave us to our ignominy. They mend the streets, but they never mend anything that is about us or belongs to us. Look at that coffin of mine—yet I tell you in its day it was a piece of furniture that would have attracted attention in any drawing-room in this city. You may have it if you want it—I can't afford to repair it. Put a new bottom in her, and part of a new top, and a bit of fresh lining along the left side, and you'll find her about as comfortable as any receptacle of her species you ever tried. No thanks—no, don't mention it—you have been civil to me, and I would give you all the property I have got before I would seem ungrateful. Now this winding-sheet is a kind of a sweet thing in its way, if you would like to—. No? Well, just as you say! but I wished to be fair and liberal—there's nothing mean about 
me
 Good-by, friend, I must be going. I may have a good way to go to-night—don't know. I only know one thing for certain, and that is, that I am on the emigrant trail, now, and I'll never sleep in that crazy old cemetery again. I will travel till I find respectable quarters, if I have to hoof it to New Jersey. All the boys are going. It was decided in public conclave, last night, to emigrate, and by the time the sun rises there won't be a bone left in our old habitations. Such cemeteries may suit my surviving friends, but they do not suit the remains that have the honor to make these remarks. My opinion is the general opinion. If you doubt it, go and see how the departing ghosts upset things before they started. They were almost riotous in their demonstrations of distaste. Hello, here are some of the Bledsoes, and if you will give me a lift with this tombstone I guess I will join company and jog along with them—mighty respectable old family, the Bledsoes, and used to always come out in six horse hearses, and all that sort of thing fifty years ago when I walked these streets in daylight. Good-by, friend."
And with his gravestone on his shoulder he joined the grizzly procession,
Mrs. M.
—"DOES YOUR SEWING MACHINE WORK WELL, DEAR?"
Mrs. N.
—"ONLY SO, SO."
Mrs. M.
—(
Exhibiting a beautiful piece of work done by the WEED SEWING MACHINE
.)—"SO DOES MINE. IT IS A 'WEED,' AND IT DOES 
SEW, SEW
, BEAUTIFULLY. TAKE MY ADVICE AND GET ONE, DEAR; YOU WILL FIND IT A GREAT SAVING OF TIME AND TEMPER. SEND TO THE WEED SEWING MACHINE COMPANY, 26 UNION SQUARE, NEW YORK, AND GET THEIR CIRCULARS AND SAMPLES OF WORK.
 dragging his damaged coffin after him, for notwithstanding he pressed it upon me so earnestly, I utterly refused his hospitality. I suppose that for as much as two hours these sad out-casts went clacking by, laden with their dismal effects, and all that time I sat pitying them. One or two of the youngest and least dilapidated among them inquired about midnight trains on the railways, but the rest seemed unacquainted with that mode of travel, and merely asked about common public roads to various towns and cities, some of which are not on the map now, and vanished from it and from the earth as much as thirty years ago, and some few of them never 
had
 existed anywhere but on maps, and private ones in real estate agencies at that. And they asked about the condition of the cemeteries in these towns and cities, and about the reputation the citizens bore as to reverence for the dead.
This whole matter interested me deeply, and likewise compelled my sympathy for these homeless ones. And it all seeming real, and I not knowing it was a dream, I mentioned to one shrouded wanderer an idea that had entered my head to publish an account of this curious and very sorrowful exodus, but said also that I could not describe it truthfully, and just as it occurred, without seeming to trifle with a grave subject and exhibit an irreverence for the dead that would shock and distress their surviving friends. But this bland and stately remnant of a former citizen leaned him far over my gate and whispered in my ear, and said:—
"Do not let that disturb you. The community that can stand such graveyards as those we are emigrating from can stand anything a body can say about the neglected and forsaken dead that lie in them."
At that very moment a cock crowed, an the weird procession vanished and left not a shred or a bone behind. I awoke, and found myself lying with my head out of the bed and "sagging" downwards considerably—a position favourable to dreaming dreams with morals in them maybe but not poetry.
NOTE.—The reader is assured that if the cemeteries in his town are kept in good order, this Dream is not levelled at his town at all, but is levelled particularly and venomously at the 
next
 town.
MY LATE SENATORIAL SECRETARYSHIP.
MARK TWAIN.
I am not a private secretary to a senator any more, now. I held the berth two months in security and in great cheerfulness of spirit, but my bread began to return from over the waters, then—that is to say, my works came back and revealed themselves. I judged it best to resign. The way of it was this. My employer sent for me one morning tolerable early, and, as soon as I had finished inserting some conundrums clandestinely into his last great speech upon finance, I entered the presence. There was something portentous in his appearance. His cravat was untied, his hair was in a state of disorder, and his countenance bore about it the signs of a suppressed storm. He held a package of letters in his tense grasp, and I knew that the dreaded Pacific mail was in. He said:
"MY EYE IS UPON YOU."
(
Frightful apparition of a phantom eye which appeared to two Burglars
.) 
First Burglar
,—"BAULKED AGAIN, BY THUNDER!—IT'S ONE OF MARVIN'S SPHERICAL BURGLAR-PROOF SAFES."
MARVIN'S SPHERICAL SAFE.—THE ESSEX COUNTY REPUBLICAN gives an account of an attempt to break open one of Marvin's Spherical Burglar-Proof Safes, belonging to the Keeseville National Bank, the lock of which had been injured by the futile efforts of burglars to get at the contents. After a whole day devoted to experiments with cold chisels and powder, the safe was filled with sand and a two pound charge of powder introduced, which was exploded with the noise of one of McClellan's big guns, sending the door some 500 feet into the air. The REPUBLICAN'S account of the affair concludes as follows:
"Our story is done. Our conclusion is, that the Marvin's Spherical Burglar-Proof Safe is the champion article of the world. It had been put to the severest test, no one knows how many hours, by experienced burglars, with no apparent impression upon it except a trifling injury to the lock, and that did nothing towards helping them into it. And then, on Friday, the whole day was spent by an expert, a dozen smiths—more or less—with the entire stockholdership of the bank, and certainly not less than one hundred men and boys, and finally by resorting to the "villainy" of powder the door was blown out and entrance was obtained. When we have money enough to want a safe, which can't be a great while, according to "malicious" rumors in circulation, we shall know where to apply."
"I thought you were worthy of confidence?"
I said: "Yes, sir."
He said: "I gave you a letter from certain of my constituents in the State of Nevada, asking the establishment of a post-office at Baldwin's Ranch, and told you to answer it, as ingeniously as you could, with arguments which should persuade them that there was no real necessity for an office at that place."
I felt easier. "Oh, if that is all, sir, I 
did
 do that."
"Yes, you 
did
. I will read your answer, for your own humiliation: 
"'WASHINGTON, NOV. 24.
"'Messrs. Smith, Jones, and others.
"'GENTLEMEN,—What the mischief do you suppose you want with a post-office at Baldwin's Ranch? It would not do you any good. If any letters came there, you could'nt read them, you know; and, besides, such letters as ought to pass through, with money in them, for other localities, would not be likely to 
get
 through, you must perceive at once; and that would make trouble for us all. No, don't bother about a post-office in your camp. I have your best interests at heart, and feel that it would only be an ornamental folly. What you want is a nice jail, you know—a nice substantial jail and a free school. These will be a lasting benefit to you. These will make you really contented and happy. I will move in the matter at once.
"'Very truly, etc.,
MARK TWAIN,
"'For James W. N—, U. S, Senator.'
"That is the way you answered that letter. Those people say they will hang me, if I ever enter that district again; and I am perfectly satisfied they 
will
, too."
"Well, Sir, I did not know I was doing any harm. I only wanted to convince them."
"Ah. Well, you 
did
 convince them, I make no manner of doubt. Now, here is another specimen. I gave you a petition from certain gentlemen of Nevada, praying that I would get a bill through Congress incorporating the Methodist Episcopal Church of the State of Nevada. I told you to say, in reply, that the creation of such a law came more properly within the province of the State Legislature; and to endeavour to show them, that, in the present feebleness of the religious element in that new commonwealth, the expediency of incorporating the church was questionable. What did you write?
"'WASHINGTON, NOV. 24.
"'Rev. John Halifax and others.
GENTLEMEN,—You will have to go to the State Legislature about that speculation of yours—Congress don't know anything about religion. But don't you hurry to go there, either; because this thing you propose to do out in that new country isn't expedient—in fact, it is ridiculous. Your religious people there are too feeble, in intellect, in morality, in piety—in everything, pretty much. You had better drop this—you can't make it work. You can't issue stock on an incorporation like that—or if you could, it would only keep you in trouble all the time. The other denominations would abuse it, and "bear" it, and "sell it short," and break it down. They would do with it just as they would with one of your silver mines out there—they would try to make all the world believe it was "wildcat." You ought not to do anything that is calculated to bring a sacred thing into disrepute. You ought to be ashamed of yourselves—that is what 
I
 think about it. You close your petition with the words: 'And we will ever pray.' I think you had better—you need to do it.
"'Very truly, etc.,
MARK TWAIN,
"'For James W. N—, U. S. Senator.'
FAC-SIMILE OF TWO CUTS EXECUTED WITH A PAIR OF SCISSORS BY OUR CHARLEY, (AGED 9)
THE NEW YORK READER.
The first number of a new 
Illustrated Weekly
 entitled THE NEW YORK READER will be issued June 1st, 1873.
THE NEW YORK READER will contain 
24 pages
 of entertaining and instructive reading matter, consisting of Stories and Sketches by the best Literary Talent of the day; selections of Editorials from the Leading Republican and Democratic Dailies on the current topics of the week, political or otherwise; Agricultural items, and other novel features which will recommend it to a large class of readers throughout the country. THE NEW YORK READER will be sold for 
6 cents
 a copy, or 
$3
 a year, making it one of the CHEAPEST, AS WELL AS ONE OF THE MOST ATTRACTIVE FAMILY PAPERS EVER PUBLISHED.
Remember to look at the first number, or if you cannot obtain it from your newsdealer, send your address to THE NEW YORK READER, 65 LIBERTY STREET, NEW YORK, AND THE FIRST NUMBER WILL BE SENT YOU FREE! (See page 19.)
"
That
 luminous epistle finishes me with the religious element among my constituents. But that my political murder might be made sure, some evil instinct prompted me to hand you this memorial from the grave company of elders composing the Board of Alderman of the city of San Francisco, to try your hand upon—a memorial praying that the city's right to the water-lots upon the city front might be established by law of Congress. I told you this was a dangerous matter to move in. I told you to write a non-committal letter to the Aldermen—an ambiguous letter—a letter that should avoid, as far as possible, all real consideration and discussion of the water-lot question. If there is any feeling left in you—any shame—surely this letter you wrote, in obedience to that order, ought to evoke it, when its words fall upon your ears:
"'WASHINGTON, NOV. 27.
"'The Hon. Board of Aldermen, etc.
"'GENTLEMEN,—George Washington, the revered Father of his Country, is dead. His long and brilliant career is closed, alas! for ever. He was greatly respected in this section of the country, and his untimely decease cast a gloom over the whole community. He died on the 14th day of December, 1799. He passed peacefully away from the scene of his honors and his great achievements, the most lamented hero and the best beloved that ever earth hath yielded unto Death. At such a time as this you speak of water-lots!—what a lot was his!
"'What is fame? Fame is an accident. Sir Isaac Newton discovered an apple falling to the ground—a trivial discovery, truly, and one which a million men had made before him—but his parents were influential, and so they tortured that small circumstance into something wonderful, and, lo! the simple world took up the shout, and in almost the twinkling of an eye, that man was famous. Treasure these thoughts.
'Poesy, sweet poesy, who shall estimate what the world owes to thee!'
'Mary had a little lamb, its fleece was white as snow—
'And everywhere that Mary went, the lamb was sure to go.'
'Jack and Gill went up the hill
To draw a pail of water;
Jack fell down and broke his crown,
And Gill came tumbling after.'
For simplicity, elegance of diction, and freedom from immoral tendencies, I regard those two poems in the light of gems. They are suited to all grades of intelligence, to every sphere of life—to the field, to the nursery, to the guild. Especially should no Board of Aldermen be without them.
"'Venerable fossils! write again. Nothing improves one so much as friendly correspondence. Write again—and if there is anything in this memorial of yours that refers to anything in particular, do not be backward about explaining it. We shall always be happy to hear you chirp.
"'Very truly, etc.,
MARK TWAIN,
"'For James W. N—, U. S. Senator.'
"That is an atrocious, a ruinous epistle! Distraction!"
"Well, sir, I am really sorry if there is anything wrong about it—but—but—it appears to me to dodge the water-lot question."
"Dodge the mischief! Oh!—but never mind. As long as destruction must come now, let it be complete. Let it be complete—let this last of your performances, which I am about to read, make a finality of it. I am a ruined man. I 
had
 my misgivings when I gave you the letter from Humboldt, asking that the post route from Indian Gulch to Shakspeare Gap and intermediate points, be changed partly to the old Mormon trail. But I told you it was a delicate question, and warned you to deal with it
GREAT POPULAR CLOTHIERS.
BROADWAY, CORNER WARREN STREET,
DEVLIN & CO. NEW YORK.
BROADWAY, CORNER GRAND street.
CIVIL AND MILITARY TAILORS.
ANCIENT 1473
Ye Tailor. "Methinks, Sir Knight, thou hast somewhat outgrown thine ancient harness."
MODERN 1873
"Clothes make the man. The want of them the fellow."
 deftly—to answer it dubiously, and leave them a little in the dark. And your fatal imbecility impelled you to make 
this
 disastrous reply. I should think you would stop your ears, if you are not dead to all shame:
"'WASHINGTON, NOV. 30.
"'Messrs. Perkins, Wagner, et al.
"'GENTLEMEN,—It is a delicate question about this Indian trail, but, handled with proper deftness and dubiousness, I doubt not we shall succeed in some measure or otherwise, because the place where the route leaves the Lassen Meadows, over beyond where those two Shawnee chiefs, Dilapidated. Vengeance and Biter-of-the-Clouds, were scalped last winter, this being the favorite direction to some, but others preferring something else in consequence of things, the Mormon trail leaving Mosby's at three in the morning, and passing through Jawbone Flat to Blucher, and then down by Jug-Handle, the road passing to the right of it, and naturally leaving it on the right too, and Dawson's on the left of the trail where it passes to the left of said Dawson's, and onward thence to Tomahawk, thus making the route cheaper, easier of access to all who can get at it and compassing all the desirable objects so considered by others, and, therefore, conferring the most good upon the greatest number, and, consequently, I am encouraged to hope we shall. However, I shall be ready, and happy, to afford you still futher information upon the subject, from to time, as you may desire it and the Post Office Department be enabled to furnish it to me.
"'Very truly, etc.,
MARK TWAIN,
"'For James W. N—, U. S. Senator.'
"There—now, 
what
 do you think of that?"
"Well, I don't know, sir. It—well, it appears to me—to be dubious enough."
"Du—leave the house! I am a ruined man. Those Humbolt savages never will forgive me for tangling their brains up with this inhuman letter. I have lost the respect of the Methodist Church, the Board of Aldermen—"
"Well, I haven't anything to say about that, because I may have missed it a little in their eases, but I 
was
 too many for the Baldwin's Ranch people, General!"
"Leave the house! Leave it for ever and for ever, too!"
I regarded that as a sort of covert intimation that my services could be dispensed with, and so I resigned. I never will be a private secretary to a senator again. You can't please that kind of people. They don't know anything. They can't appreciate a party's efforts.
THE NEW CRIME.
Legislation Needed.
MARK TWAIN.
THIS country, during the last thirty or forty years, has produced some of the most remarkable cases of insanity of which there is any mention in history. For instance, there was the Baldwin case, in Ohio, twenty-two years ago. Baldwin, from his boyhood up, had been of a vindictive,
The Mutual Life Insurance Co.
146 Broadway
F. S. Winston, President
Richard A. McCurdy, Vice Pres.
Gross Assets Dec 31, 1872 $58,550,059.42
Policies issued in 1872. 12,181 insuring
$34,937,775.00
Total death claims paid
19,676,738.19
Total dividends paid
25,591,461.44
Surplus overall liabilities Dec 31, 1872
3,236,070.73
Total policies in force 78,146 insuring
264,591,874.00
Increase in gross assets for the year
6,972,062.42
Ration of expenses to receipts
6.98 per cent.
malignant, quarrelsome nature. He put a boy's eye out once, and never was heard upon any occasion to utter a regret for it. He did many such things. But at last he did something that was serious. He called at a house just after dark, one evening, knocked, and when the occupant came to the door, shot him dead, and then tried to escape but was captured. Two days before, he had wantonly insulted a helpless cripple, and the man he afterward took swift vengeance upon with an assassin bullet had knocked him down. Such was the Baldwin case. The trial was long and exciting; the community was fearfully wrought up. Men said this spiteful, bad-hearted villain had caused grief enough in his time, and now he should satisfy the law. But they were mistaken. Baldwin was 
insane
 when he did the deed—they had not thought of that. By the arguments of counsel it was shown that at half-past ten in the morning on the day of the murder, Baldwin became insane, and remained so for eleven hours and a half exactly. This just covered the case comfortably, and he was acquitted. Thus, if an unthinking and excited community had been listened to instead of the arguments of counsel, a poor crazy creature would have been held to a fearful responsibility for a mere freak of madness. Baldwin went clear, and although his relatives and friends were naturally incensed against the community for their injurious suspicions and remarks, they said let it go for this time, and did not prosecute. The Baldwins were very wealthy. This same Baldwin had momentary fits of insanity twice afterward, and on both occasions killed people he had grudges against. And on both these occasions the circumstances of the killing were so aggravated, and the murders so seemingly heartless and treacherous, that if Baldwin had not been insane he would have been hanged without the shadow of a doubt. As it was, it required all his political and family influence to get him clear in one of the cases, and cost him not less than 10,000 dollars to get clear in the other. One of these men he had notoriously been threatening to kill for twelve years. The poor creature happened, by the merest piece of ill-fortune, to come along a dark alley at the very moment that Baldwin's insanity came upon him, and so he was shot in the back with a gun loaded with slugs.
Take the case of Lynch Hackett, of Pennsylvania. Twice, in public, he attacked a German butcher by the name of Bemis Feldner, with a cane, and both times Feldner whipped him with his fists. Hackett was a vain, wealthy, violent gentleman, who held his blood and family in high esteem, and believed that a reverent respect was due his great riches. He brooded over the shame of his chastisement for two weeks, and then, in a momentary fit of insanity, armed himself to the teeth, rode into town, waited a couple of hours until he saw Feldner coming down the street with his wife on his arm, and then, as the couple passed the doorway in which he had partially concealed himself, he drove a knife into Feldner's neck, killing him instantly. The widow caught the limp form and eased it to the earth. Both were drenched with blood. Hackett jocosely remarked to her that as a professional butcher's recent wife she could appreciate the artistic neatness of the job that left her in a condition to marry again, in case she wanted to. This remark, and another which he made to a friend, that his position in society made the killing of an obscure citizen simply an "eccentricity" instead of a crime, were shown to be evidences of insanity, and so Hackett escaped punishment. The jury were hardly inclined to accept these as proofs, at first, inasmuch as the prisoner had never been
THE NEW YORK READER.
Remember to get the first number of this paper, which will be issued June 1st, 1873. It will combine several novel features, of which the following are the most prominent:
Literature.
The Literary Department will comprise Entertaining Stories and Instructive Articles by the Best Writers of the day, and will alone be worth the price of the paper.
"Public Opinion."
Under this title will be given, without political bias, the views of the 
Leading Dailies
 of all parties, upon the political issues of the day, and also, selections of the best and most readable Editorials upon topics of general interest.
"The Style."
In this Department the latest Metropolitan Fashions for Gentlemen—the latest cut of the coat, and the most popular textures and colors will be reported by a prominent Fashionable Tailor; besides which, such suggestions will be given as to the proper thing in costume and etiquette as will make it a peculiarly attractive feature.
The Farm and Garden.
This Department will contain Agricultural items of interest to every farmer. It will be ably edited, and alone worth the price of the paper.
The Household.
A space will be devoted to useful receipts and practical hints in the management of domestic affairs, which will prove most valuable to housekeepers.
It is designed to make THE NEW YORK READER
EVERYBODY'S JOURNAL.
It will be issued weekly; will be handsomely illustrated throughout; will contain 
24 pages
 of entertaining and instructive reading; will be sold for 
6 cents
 a copy, or $3 a year; and will be
ONE OF THE BEST, CHEAPEST AND MOST COMPREHENSIVE PAPERS EVER PUBLISHED.
If you cannot get a copy in your neighborhood, send your address to THE NEW YORK READER, 65 LIBERTY STREET, NEW YORK, and a copy will be sent you FREE
 insane before the murder, and under the tranquillising effect of the butchering had immediately regained his light mind—but when the defence came to show that a third cousin of Hackett's wife's stepfather was insane, and not only insane, but had a nose the very counterpart of Hackett's, it was plain that insanity was hereditary in the family, and Hackett had come by it by legitimate inheritance. Of course the jury then acquitted him. But it was a merciful providence that Mrs H.'s people had been afflicted as shown, else Hackett would certainly have been hanged.
However it is not possible to recount all the marvellous cases of insanity that have come under the public notice in the last thirty or forty years. There was the Durgin case in New Jersey three years ago. The servant girl, Bridget Durgin, at dead of night, invaded her mistress's bedroom, and carved the lady literally to pieces with a knife. Then she dragged the body to the middle of the floor, and beat and banged it with chairs and such things. Next she opened the feather beds and strewed the contents around, saturated everything with kerosene, and set fire to the general wreck. She now took up the young child of the murdered woman in her blood-smeared hands, and walked off, through the snow, with no shoes on, to a neighbor's house a quarter of a mile off, and told a string of wild, incoherent stories about some men coming and setting fire to the house; and then she cried piteously, and without seeming to think there was anything suggestive about the blood upon her hands, her clothing, and the baby, volunteered the remark that she was afraid those men had murdered her mistress! Afterward, by her own confession and other testimony, it was proved that the mistress had always been kind to the girl, consequently there was no revenge in the murder; and it was also shown that the girl took nothing away from the burning house, not even her own shoes, and consequently robbery was not the motive. Now the reader says, "Here comes that same old plea of insanity again." But the reader has deceived himself this time. No such plea was offered in her defence. The judge sentenced her, nobody persecuted the Governor with petitions for her pardon, and she was promptly hanged.
There was that youth in Pennsylvania, whose curious confession was published a year ago. It was simply a conglomeration of incoherent drivel from beginning to end—and so was his lengthy speech on the scaffold afterward. For a whole year he was haunted with a desire to disfigure a certain young woman, so that no one would marry her. He did not love her himself, and did not want to marry her, but he did not want anybody else to do it. He would not go anywhere with her, and yet was opposed to anybody else's escorting her. Upon one occasion he declined to go to a wedding with her, and when she got other company, lay in wait for the couple by the road, intending to make them go back or kill the escort. After spending sleepless nights over his ruling desire for a full year, he at last attempted its execution—that is, attempted to disfigure the young woman. It was a success. It was permanent. In trying to shoot her cheek (as she sat at the supper table with her parents and brothers and sisters) in such a manner as to mar its comeliness, one of his bullets wandered a little out of the course, and she dropped dead. To the very last moment of his life he bewailed the ill luck that made her move her face just at the critical moment. And so he died apparently about half persuaded that somehow it was chiefly her own fault that she got killed. This idiot was hanged. The plea of insanity was not offered.
The Remington Rifle.
E. REMINGTON & SONS,
Manufacturers of Military, Sporting, Hunting and Target Breech-Loading Rifles; also, Shot Guns, Double and Single Barrelled, &c., &c.
Armory, ILION, N. Y.
Salesrooms, 281 & 283 Broadway, New York.
Insanity certainly is on the increase in the world, and crime is dying out. There are no longer any murders—none worth mentioning, at any rate. Formerly, if you killed a man, it was possible that you were insane—but now if you (having friends and money) kill a man it is 
evidence
 that you are a lunatic.
In these days, too, if a person of good family and high social standing steals anything, they call it 
kleptomania
, and send him to the lunatic asylum. If a person of high standing squanders his fortune in dissipation and closes his career with strychnine or a bullet, "Temporary Abberration" is what was the trouble with 
him
.
Is not this insanity plea becoming rather common? Is it not so common that the reader confidently expects to see it offered in every criminal case that comes before the courts? And is it not so cheap, and so common, and often so trivial, that the reader smiles in derision when the newspaper mentions it? And is it not curious to note how very often it wins acquittal for the prisoner? Lately it does not seem possible for a man to so conduct himself before killing another man, as not to be manifestly insane. If he talks about the stars he is insane. If he appears nervous and uneasy an hour before the killing he is insane. If he weeps over a great grief, his friends shake their heads and fear that he is "not right." If, an hour after the murder he seems ill at ease, pre-occupied, and excited, he is unquestionably insane.
Really, what we want now is not laws against crime but a law against 
insanity
. There is where the true evil lies.
BACK FROM "YURRUP."
MARK TWAIN.
HAVE you ever seen a family of geese just back from Europe—or Yurrup, as they pronounce it? They never talk 
to
 you, of course, being strangers, but they talk to each other and 
at
 you till you are pretty nearly distracted with their clatter; till you are sick of their ocean experiences; their mispronounced foreign names; their dukes and emperors; their trivial adventures; their pointless reminiscences; till you are sick of their imbecile faces and their relentless clack, and wished it had pleased Providence to leave the clapper out of their empty skulls.
I traveled with such a family one eternal day, from New York to Boston, last week. They had spent just a year in "Yurrup," and were returning home to Boston. Papa said little, and looked bored—he had simply been down to New York to receive and cart home his cargo of traveled imbecility. Sister Angeline, aged 23, sister Augusta, aged 25, and brother Charles, aged 33, did the conversational drivel, and mamma purred and admired, and threw in some help when occasion offered, in the way of remembering some barber's—I should say some French count's—name, when they pretended to have forgotten it. They occupied the choice seats in
Peake, Opdycke & Co.
Sole Importers of the Buffalo and Other Alpacas Beaver Mohairs and Sable Brilliantines
DRESS GOODS, WHITE GOODS, WOOLENS, HOSIERY, NOTIONS, SHAWLS, FLANNELS, DOMESTICS, PRINTS.
 the parlour of the drawing-room car, and for twelve hours I sat opposite to them—was their 
vis-á-vis
, they would have said, in their charming French way.
Augusta.
 "Plague that nahsty (nasty) steamer! I've the headache yet, she rolled so the fifth day out."
Angeline.
 "And well you may. 
I
 never saw such a nahsty old tub. I never want to go in the 
Ville de Paris
 again. Why 
didn't
 we go over to London and come in the 
Scotia
?"
Aug.
 "Because we were fools!"
[I endorsed that sentiment.]
Angie.
 "Gustie, what made Count Nixkumarouse drive off looking so blue, that last Thursday in Pairy? (Paris, she meant.) Ah, own up now?" (tapping her arm 
so
 roguishly with her ivory fan.)
Aug.
 "Now, Angie, how you talk! I 
told
 the nahsty creature I would not receive his attentions any longer. And the old duke, his father, kept boring me about him and his two million francs a year till I sent 
him
 off with a flea in his ear."
Chorus.
 "Ke-he-he! Ha-ha-ha!"
Charles.
 [Pulling a small silken cloak to pieces.] "Angie, where'd you get this cheap thing?"
Angie.
 "You, Cholly, let that alone! Cheap! Well, how could I help it? There we were, tied up in Switzerland—just down from Mon Blong (Mont Blanc, doubtless)—couldn't buy anything in those nahsty shops so far away from Pairy. I had to put up with that slimpsy forty-dollar rag—but bless you, I couldn't go naked!"
Chorus.
 "Ke-he-he!"
Aug.
 "Guess who I was thinking of? Those ignorant persons we saw first in Rome and afterwards in Venice—those—"
Angie.
 "Oh, ha-ha-ha! He-he-he! It 
was
 so funny! Papa, one of them called the Santa della Spiggiola the Santa della Spizziola! Ha-ha-ha! And she thought it was Canova that did Michael Angelo's Moses! Only 
think
 of it!—Canova, a sculptor, and the Moses a picture! I thought I should die! I guess I let them see by the way I laughed, that they'd made fools of themselves, because they blushed and sneaked off."
[Papa laughed faintly, but not with the easy grace of a man who was certain he knew what he was laughing about.]
Aug.
 "Why, Cholly! Where did you get those nahsty Beaumarchais gloves? Well, I 
wouldn't
 if I were you!"
Mamma.
 [With uplifted hands] "Beaumarchais, my son!"
Angie.
 "Beaumarchais! Why how can you! Nobody in Pairy wears those nahsty things but the commonest people."
Charles.
 "They 
are
 a rum lot, but then Tom Blennerhasset gave 'em to me—he wanted to do something or other to curry favor, I s'pose."
Angie.
 "Tom Blennerhasset!"
Aug.
 "Tom Blennerhasset!"
Mamma.
 "Tom Blennerhasset! And have you been associating with 
him
."
Papa.
 [Suddenly interested] "Heavens, what has the son of an honored and honorable old friend been doing?"
Chorus.
 "Doing! Why his father has endorsed himself bankrupt for friends—that's what's the matter!"
Angie.
 "Oh, mon Dieu, j'ai faim! Avez-vous quelque chose de bon,
PHOeBUS FECIT.
Photo-Engraving Co.
Dan Phoebus—(Showing a Relief Plate to Monsieur Daguerre
)—"THERE, MY BOY, YOU NEVER THOUGHT WE SHOULD BE ABLE TO DO THAT, DID YOU?"
L. SMITH HOBART, 
President
.
J. C. MOSS, 
Superintendent
.
D. I. CARSON, 
General Agent
.
PHOTO-ENGRAVING CO., 62 Courtlandt Street, New York.
RELIEF PLATES FOR NEWSPAPER, BOOK AND CATALOGUE ILLUSTRATIONS engraved in very hard Type Metal, by a new chemical process, direct from all kinds of Prints, Pen-and-Ink Drawings, Original Designs, &c. This process is in many respects vastly superior to wood engraving. The plates have a printing surface as smooth as glass, and the lines are deeper than those of hand-out engravings. We guarantee all our plates to print ABSOLUTELY CLEAN AND SHARP on either wet or dry paper, and on any kind of press where type or wood cuts can be printed.
Our Prices will not average much more than Half those charged for Wood Cuts.
All the pictures in this book were engraved by the PHOTO-ENGRAVING CO.
 en votre poche, mon cher frere? Excuse me for speaking French, for to tell the truth, I haven't spoken English for so long that it comes dreadful awkward. Wish we were back in Yurrup—c'est votre desire aussi, n'est-ce pas, mes cheres?"
And from that moment they lapsed into barbarous French and kept it up for an hour—hesitating, gasping for words, stumbling head over heels through adverbs and participles, floundering among adjectives, working miracles of villanous pronunciation—and neither one of them by any chance ever understanding what another was driving at.
By that time some new comers had entered the car, and so they lapsed into English again, and fell to holding everything American up to scorn and contumely in order that they might thus let those new-comers know they were just home from "Yurrup." To use their pet and best beloved phrase, they were a "nahsty" family of American snobs, and there ought to be a law against allowing such to go to Europe and misrepresent the nation. It will take these insects five years, without doubt to get done turning up their noses at everything American and making damaging comparisons between their own country and "Yurrup." Let us pity their waiting friends in Boston in their affliction.
MORE DISTINCTION.
MARK TWAIN.
I HAVE become an honorary member of the Western New York Poultry Society, and my ambition is satisfied.
Seriously, from early youth I have taken an especial interest in the subject of poultry-raising, and so this membership touches a ready sympathy in my breast. Even as a school-boy, poultry-raising was a study with me, and I may say without egotism that as early as the age of seventeen I was acquainted with all the best and speediest methods of raising chickens, from raising them off a roost by burning lucifer matches under their noses, down to lifting them off a fence on a frosty night by insinuating the end of a warm board under their heels. By the time I was twenty years old, I really suppose I had raised more poultry than any one individual in all the section round about there. The very chickens came to know my talent, by-and-by. The youth of both sexes ceased to paw the earth for worms, and old roosters that came to crow "remained to pray," when I passed by.
I have had so much experience in the raising of fowls that I cannot but think that a few hints from me might be useful to the Society. The two methods I have already touched upon are very simple, and are only used in the raising of the commonest class of fowls; one is for Summer, the other for Winter. In the one case, you start out with a friend along about eleven o'clock on a Summer's night (not later, because in some States—especially in California and Oregon—chickens always rouse up just at midnight and crow from ten to thirty minutes, according to the ease or difficulty they experience in getting the public waked up), and your friend carries
 with him a sack. Arrived at the hen roost (your neighbor's, not your own), you light a match and hold it under first one and then another pullet's nose until they are willing to go into that bag without making any trouble about it. You then return home, either taking the bag with you or leaving it behind, according as circumstances shall dictate. N. B. I 
have
 seen the time when it was eligible and appropriate to leave the sack behind and walk off with considerable velocity, without ever leaving any word where to send it.
In the case of the other method mentioned for raising poultry, your friend takes along a covered vessel with a charcoal fire in it, and you carry a long, slender plank. This is a frosty night, understand. Arrived at the tree, or fence, or other hen-roost (your own, if you are an idiot), you warm the end of your plank in your friend's fire-vessel, and then raise it aloft, and ease it up gently against a slumbering chicken's foot. If the subject of your attentions is a true bird, he will infallibly return thanks with a sleepy cluck or two and step out and take up quarters on the plank, thus becoming so conspicuously accessory before the fact to his own murder as to make it a grave question in our minds, as it once was in the mind of Blackstone, whether he is not really and deliberately committing suicide in the second degree. [But you enter into a contemplation of these legal refinements subsequently—not then.]
When you wish to raise a fine, large, donkey-voiced Shanghai rooster, you do it with a lasso, just as you would a bull. It is because he must be choked, and choked effectually, too. It is the only good, certain way, for whenever he mentions a matter which he is cordially interested in, the chances are ninety-nine in a hundred that he secures somebody else's immediate attention to it, too, whether it be day or night.
The Black Spanish is an exceedingly fine bird and a costly one. Thirty-five dollars is the usual figure, and fifty a not uncommon price for a specimen. Even its eggs are worth from a dollar to a dollar and a half apiece, and yet are so unwholesome that the city physician seldom or never orders them for the workhouse. Still I have once or twice procured as high as a dozen at a time for nothing, in the dark of the moon. The best way to raise the Black Spanish fowl, is to go late in the evening and raise coop and all. The reason I recommend this method, is, that the birds being so valuable, the owners do not permit them to roost around promiscuously, but put them in a coop as strong as a fire-proof safe, and keep it in the kitchen at night. The method I speak of is not always a bright and satisfying success, and yet there are so many little articles of 
vertu
 about a kitchen that if you fail on the coop you can generally bring away something else. I brought away a nice steel trap, one night, worth ninety cents.
But what is the use in my pouring out my whole intellect on this subject? I have shown the Western New York Poultry Society that they have taken to their bosom a party who is not a Spring chicken by any means, but a man who knows all about poultry, and is just as high up in the most efficient methods of raising it as the President of the institution himself. I thank these gentlemen for the honorary membership they have conferred upon me, and shall stand at all times ready and willing to testify my good feeling and my official zeal by deeds as well as by this hastily penned advice and information. Whenever they are ready to go to raising poultry, let them call for me any evening after eleven o'clock and I shall be on hand promptly.
WONDERFUL TYPOGRAPHY.
The following minute copies of the first page of 
The Sun, New York Observer
 and 
New York Tribune
, are specimens of the finest typography ever executed. They are exact miniature re-productions of the matter contained on the first pages of these papers on the dates given, and are printed from stereotype plates on a cylinder press. Although the letters are so small as scarce to be deciphered by the naked eye, yet a strong magnifying glass will reveal the perfect readable type. Of the 
Sun
, we have selected the issue of September 4th, 1872, to present in this form, for the reason that it contains the first developments of the "Credit Mobilier Frauds," which the 
Sun
 was the first to throw "a ray of light upon." Of the 
New York Observer
, an exact 
fac-simile
 in type and matter of the first number, issued May 17, 1823, is placed in juxtaposition to the paper of 1873, showing the change in the form and size of the paper since its foundation 50 years  ago.
The editor of the Petalumna (Cal.) 
Crescent
 makes his annual report as follows:—
"The various banks, insurance companies, etc., have made their annual reports, the editor begs leave to present to the public the following as his operations during the last six months: 
A COMPREHENSIVE STATEMENT.
Been asked to drink
11,303
Drank
1,396
Requested to retract
416
Didn't retract
416
Invited to parties, receptions, etc., by parties fishing for puffs
3,333
Took the hint
33
Didn't take the hint
3,300
Threatened to be whipped
174
Been whipped
0
Whipped the other fellow
4
Been promised bottles of champagne, whisky, gin, bitters, boxes of cigars, etc., if we would go after them
6,650
Been after them
0
Going again
0
Been asked "What's the news?"
200,000
Lied about it
199,999
Told
1
Been to Church
1
Changed politics
33
Expect to change still
33
Cash on hand
$00
Gave for charity
$00
Gave for a terrier dog
$23
Swore off bad habits
722
Shall swear off this year
703
Number of bad habits
0
A Miniature Sun.
THE SUN IS PUBLISHED DAILY, SEMI-WEEKLY AND WEEKLY At No. 170 Nassau Street, New York City. 
SUBSCRIPTION RATES.
DAILY, (mail), 50 cents per month, per year, $6 00
SEMI-WEEKLY, " 2 00
WEEKLY, " 1 00
A SELF-MADE MAN.
MARK TWAIN.
SAMUEL McFADDEN was a watchman in a bank. He was poor, but honest, and his life was without reproach. The trouble with him was that he felt he was not appreciated.
His salary was only four dollars a week, and when he asked to have it raised, the president, cashier, and the board of directors glared at him through their spectacles, and frowned on him, and told him to go out and stop his insolence, when he knew business was dull, and the bank could not meet its expenses now, let alone lavishing one dollar on such a miserable worm as Samuel McFadden.
And then Samuel McFadden felt depressed, sad, and the haughty scorn of the president and cashier cut him to the soul.
He would often go to the side yard, and bow his venerable twenty-four inch head, and weep gallons and gallons of tears over his insignificance, and pray that he might be made worthy of the cashier's and president's polite attention.
One night a happy thought struck him; a gleam of light burst upon him, and gazing down the dim vista of years with his eyes all blinded with joyous tears, he saw himself rich and respected.
So Samuel McFadden fooled around and got a jimmy, a monkey-wrench, a cross-cut saw, a cold chisel, and about a ton of gunpowder and nitroglycerine, and those things. Then, in the dead of night, he went to the fire-proof safe, and after working at it for a while, burst the door and brick into an eternal smash, with such a perfect success that there was not enough of that safe left to make a carpet tack.
Mr. McFadden then proceeded to load up with coupons, greenbacks, currency and specie, and to nail all the odd change that was lying anywhere, so that he pranced out of the bank with over a million dollars on him. Then he retired to an unassuming residence out of town, and then sent word to the detectives where he was.
A detective called on him next day with a soothing note from the cashier. McFadden treated it with lofty scorn.
Detectives called on him every day with humble notes from the president, cashier, and board of directors.
At last the bank officers got up a magnificent private supper, to which McFadden was invited.
He came, and as the bank officers bowed down to the dust before him, he pondered well over the bitter past, and his soul was filled with exultation.
Before he drove away in his carriage that night it was all fixed that McFadden was to keep half a million of that money, and to be unmolested if he returned the other half.
He fulfilled his contract like an honest man, but refused, with haughty disdain, the offer of the cashier to marry his daughter.
Mac is now honored and respected. He moves in the best society, he browses around in purple and fine linen, and other good clothes, and enjoys himself first rate. And often now he takes his infant son on his knee, and
Miniature Type.
THE DAILY TRIBUNE, $10 a year. SEMI-WEEKLY TRIBUNE,
One copy, one year, $3 00
Five copies, or over, each copy, 2 50
Ten copies (and one extra copy,) 25 00
THE WEEKLY TRIBUNE.
One copy, one year, $2 00.
Five, $7 50.
TO ONE ADDRESS.
10 copies, $1 25 ea
20 copies, 1 10 ea
30 copies, 1 00 ea
TO SUBSCRIBERS.
10 copies, $1 35 ea
20 copies, 1 20 ea
30 copies 1 10 ea
And an extra to each Club.
Cash in Advance.
ADDRESS, THE TRIBUNE, NEW YORK.
 tells him of his early life, and instills holy principles into the child's mind, and shows him how, by industry and perseverance, and frugality, and nitroglycerine, and monkey wrenches, and cross-cut saws, and familiarity with the detective system, even the poor may rise to affluence and responsibility.
THE BARBER.
A Short Drama in One Act and One Scene.
ACT FIRST.
SCENE: A METROPOLITAN BARBER'S SHOP.
Dramatis Personae:
OILY, 
a Barber
.
JONES, 
a Customer
.
OILY.
Take a seat, Sir; pray take a seat.
OILY puts a chair for JONES, who sits. During the following dialogue OILY continues cutting JONES'S hair.]
OILY.
We have had much wet, sir.
JONES.
Very much.
OILY.
And yet October's early days were fine.
JONES.
They were.
OILY.
I hoped fair weather might have lasted us until the end.
JONES.
At 
one
 time, so did 
I
.
OILY.
But we have had it 
very
 wet.
JONES.
We 
have
.
[A pause of some minutes.
OILY.
I know not, sir, who cut your hair last time;
But 
this
 I say, sir, it was badly cut.
No doubt 'twas in the country?
JONES.
No—in town.
OILY.
Indeed! I should have fancied otherwise.
JONES.
'Twas cut in town—and in this very room.
OILY.
Amazement! But I now remember well:
We had an awkward new provincial hand,
A fellow from the country; Sir, he did
More damage to my business in a week
Than all my skill can in a year repair.
He
 must have cut your hair.
JONES.
[looking scrutinizingly at his interlocutor.]
No. 'twas 
yourself
.
OILY.
Myself!—impossible! You must mistake.
JONES.
I 
don't
 mistake: 
'twas
 you that cut my hair.
[A long pause, interrupted only by the more frequent clipping of the scissors.]
OILY.
Your hair is very dry, sir.
JONES.
Ah!—indeed!
OILY.
Yes—
very
 dry. Our "
Vegetable Extract
" moistens hair.
JONES.
I like it dry.
OILY.
But, sir, the hair when dry, turns quickly 
gray
.
JONES.
That color I prefer.
OILY.
But hair, when gray, will rapidly fall off,
And baldness will ensue.
JONES.
I would be bald.
OILY.
Perhaps you mean to say you'd like a wig;
We've wigs so natural, they can't be told
From real hair.
JONES.
Deception I detest.
[Another pause ensues, during which OILY blows down JONES'S neck, and relieves him from a linen wrapper, in which he has been enveloped during the process of hair-cutting.]
OILY.
We've brushes, soaps, and scents of every kind.
JONES.
I 
see
 you have. 
(Pays thirty cents.)
 I think you'll find that right.
OILY.
Is there nothing I can show you, sir?
JONES.
No, nothing. Yes—there may be something, too,
That you may show me.
OILY.
Name it, sir.
JONES.
The door.
[Exit JONES.
OILY.
[To his man.]
That's a rare customer, at any rate.
Had I cut him as short as he cut me,
How little hair upon his head would be!
But if kind friends will all our pains requite,
We'll hope for better luck another night.
[Shop-bell rings, and curtain falls.]
New York Observer
THE OLDEST RELIGIOUS AND SECULAR NEWSPAPER.
SIDNEY E. MORSE & CO, 37 PARK ROW NEW YORK.
TERMS $3.00 A YEAR, IN ADVANCE.
FOUNDED 1823 HALF A CENTURY
THE GREAT AMERICAN FAMILY NEWSPAPER
FLORENCE THE PIRATE.
His Summer operations in Barnegat Bay.
Having heard that fish were running right lively in Barnegat bay, a few weeks ago, a SUN reporter went down to Waretown and hired a Jersey skipper for two days. The skipper took the reporter across the bay to the beach in an oyster boat. The party found accommodations at the house of Mr. Cox, about two miles below the lighthouse. Mr. Cox was a piratical-looking man, wearing a blue shirt, a baggy pair of pantaloons, buckled around him with a leather strap, and an old straw hat. He was barefooted. After shaking hands with Mr. Cox, the reporter passed out on the stoop, where he met another pirate. The second pirate was dressed like the first. His face was terribly tanned, and his nose was broad and very prettily colored. He claimed acquaintance with the reporter. He proved to be Mr. William J. Florence, a gentleman who is now exceedingly anxious to learn the whereabouts of Mr. Thomas C. Fields. The pirate Florence was smoking a very black pipe, and killing mosquitoes by the bushel.
A TALK WITH FLORENCE THE PIRATE.
"What brought you down here?" he said to the reporter.
"Well, I thought I'd come down and pick up a few bluefish, or kingfish, or Spanish mackerel," was the reply. "Are there any here?"
"Yes; lots of 'em," responded the pirate Florence. "Did you ever catch any sheepshead?"
"No," answered the reporter, "I never did. Are there any sheepshead here?"
"Yes; lots of 'em." was the pirate's reply.
Reporter—Did you ever catch any?
The Pirate—No; I never caught any, but I'm going to take in some tomorrow morning. There's lots of 'em here, out in the inlet.
Reporter—Have you caught any fish to-day?
The Pirate—A half dozen border ruffians and a dozen kingfish.
Reporter—What is a border ruffian? I never heard of such a fish before.
Florence the Pirate—Dunno what a border ruffian is? Why that's what we call a bluefish. There's plenty of fish here—lots of 'em. You can get all the weakers you want and all the kingfish you want. You jes' come down here in October and you can stand on the shore of the bay and chuck out and pull in all the bass you want; and when you get tired of pulling in bass you can go out on the beach and chuck out and yank in all the border ruffians you want.
HOW THE PIRATE CATCHES BASS.
Reporter—How large do the bass run.
Mr. Florence—Well, they're pretty good size, (refilling his pipe and mashing a pint of mosquitoes.) Three, four, and some, seven pounds. But talking of bass-fishing, there's no such bass-fishing anywhere around here as there is out at No Man's Land. Why out there—I go there every year—its a common thing to pull in a bass weighing a hundred pounds. I've caught lots of 'em. A man that understands fishing and knows how to play
Character Sketches.
George.
—"WHAT ARE YOU PLAYING, LOTTIE?"
Lottie.
—"'SOFTLY O'ER THE RIPPLING WATERS'—YOU SEE, GEORGE, THIS IS A 
WATERS PIANO
."
George.
—"AH, YES, THAT ACCOUNTS FOR ITS LIQUID NOTES."
A GREAT OFFER.
Horace Waters & Son, 481 Broadway, N. Y., WILL DISPOSE OF 
100
 PIANOS, MELODEONS AND ORGANS OF FIRST-CLASS MAKERS, INCLUDING WATERS', AT EXTREMELY LOW PRICES. NEW 7 OCTAVE PIANOS, MODERN IMPROVEMENTS, FOR $250 AND $275, CASH.
WATERS' CONCERTO PARLOR ORGANS Are the most beautiful in style and perfect in tone ever made, and will wear a life-time. The CONCERTO STOP is the best ever played in any Organ. It is produced by a third set of reeds peculiarly voiced, the EFFECT of which is MOST CHARMING and SOUL-STIRRING, while its IMITATION of the HUMAN VOICE is SUPERB. Prices low for cash, or a small part cash and balance in monthly or quarterly payments. Other Organs $55, $75, and DOUBLE REED ORGANS, $100, $110 and upwards. Pianos and Organs to let, and rent money allowed if purchased. ILLUSTRATED CATALOGUES MAILED.
Warerooms, 481 Broadway. New York.
HORACE WATERS & SON.
 'em right can get 'em in without any trouble. You stand on the rocks there and sling out, and you'll get a bite in no time. It's the greatest place in the world for bass. All you've got to do is to git up early in the morning, and buy a barrel of soft clams. Then you git an ox-cart for a dollar, and git the clams taken down to the beach. You see the beach is all rocks. Well, you have a countryman open the clams, an' you stand on the rocks an' begin to chuck 'em into the sea. The tow takes them out in a great, long string, until you'll have a string of floatin' clams reachin' a thousand feet out into the ocean. And then the bass they come a feedin' along the shore an' they strike this string of clams, an' they come follerin' up the clams, a-lookin' for suth'n' better until they reach the foot of the rocks. Then's the time to snake 'em in. Put half a crab on your hook an' sling in, an' you can catch all the big bass you want to. They'll weigh from fifty to a hundred pound—yes, I've seen 'em weigh two hundred pound.
Reporter (very quietly)—Did you ever see one weighing 549 pounds?
The Great Pirate Florence (hesitating)—I've seen some mighty big uns, I've seen 'em weigh well onto three hundred pounds.
THE PIRATE'S FISHING ROD.
Reporter—Do you use a rod to catch them with?
Pirate—Oh, yes! I want to show you my rod.
Here Mr. Florence knocked the ashes out of his pipe, slew another pint of mosquitoes, and went into the bar-room. He soon returned with a rod a little larger than a pipe stem, with a tip like a spear of timothy.
"That's the rod I always catch fish with," he said, swinging the rod around among the mosquitoes.
"What kind of fish do you catch with it?" asked the reporter.
"Well, I'm catching weakfish with it now." was the answer.
Reporter—The weakfish must be small here.
Mr. Florence—Oh! they're pretty good size. I caught one that weighed a pound and a half just now.
Reporter—Well that's a mighty light rod to fish with.
The Pirate Florence—That's the rod I always fish with. I never use a heavier rod.
Reporter—Do you mean to say that you catch hundred pound bass on that rod?
Mr. Florence had evidently forgotten about the bass. He hesitated a moment, but finally blurted out: "Yes, sir: I've pulled in a great many hundred pound bass on that rod. You see, if you only know how to fish, playing 'em judiciously like, it's easy enough to get 'em in. I never lose a bass."
TRYING FLORENCE'S ROD.
The reporter had got enough. He would have doubted Mr. Florence's word if he had not been a gentleman. An hour after supper, the party went out in a boat. Mr. Florence stuck the half of a shedder-crab upon his hook, spat upon it, and rose up from his seat. There was a flourish like that of an old-fashioned stage driver before he cracks his whip, then a singing of the reel and the shedder-crab struck the water nearly half way across the bay.
"You see, everything's in playing your fish," said Mr. Florence. At that moment he got a bite. The fish played Mr. Florence. He jerked the end of his pole into the water, yanked his reel out of place, and then walked away with his line.
"I'll bet $5 that's a cussed stingaree," said the pirate Florence, swelling up in the face and abdomen, and laying down his rod in disgust. The reporter offered him a leader and swivel, with an excellent sinker and two cuttyhunk hooks, but the stingaree had made Mr. Florence hungry, and he insisted upon going in to supper. So the fishermen went in, Florence being remarkably quiet.
STORY OF THE PIRATE FLORENCE.
At midnight the party sat upon the verandah, and somebody clicked the spring, and set Mr. Florence to talking again. He said:
"There used to be lots of bass in the Harlem river up at McComb's Dam, where I keep my hotel. Fellers used to set on the bridge a fishing all day long, and they always had good luck. Now there ain't any bass there. Somehow or other the bass have all left, and these infernal toadfish have taken their place. (Mr. Florence here took an intermission and killed a peck of mosquitoes.) Last summer as I was a setting on the stoop in front of the hotel, a big Englishman came along. He hed a white plug hat on, two feet high, with a rim about as wide as the handle of a teaspoon, and he hed a big green bag under his arm, and he hed a leather valise swung over his shoulder. He come up to me and he says, 'His there any fishink 'ere, sir?' Says I, 'Yes, lots of 'em.' Says he, 'I beg pawdon. Might I hask you what's the best kind o' fish you catch 'ere?' 'Well,' says I, 'the best kind of fish you get here is what we call a toad fish.' 'Blawst my bloody heyes,' he says, 'that's a hextraordinary name for a fish. Is it a good heatink fish?' 'Oh! It's a delicious fish,' I said; 'melts in your mouth like butter. Did you ever fish much?' I asked him. 'Well' he said, 'I used to catch sawmon in Hingland and Scotland, but I never did any fishink in America, and as hi was riding along 'ere the hother day, hi saw some gentlemen a fishink, and I resolved to come hup and try my luck. Hi used to be a great sawmon fisherman. What bait do you use for these toad fish?' 'Crabs,' says I. 'Well, really,' says he, 'that's
A VERY HEXTRAORDINARY BAIT,
you know. Where can I purchase some of these crabs?' 'Oh!' says I, 'you can get 'em of that boy there,' and I showed him a little feller who had a basket of crabs to sell," (Here Mr. Florence began to thrash around again, and succeeded in killing another peck of mosquitoes.) "Well, the Englishman, he called the boy up and began to pick the crabs out of his basket. I don't believe he ever saw a crab before. Two of the crabs got hold of his fingers and he danced around like a wild Indian. The boy laughed and picked out a half-dozen crabs for him, himself. The Englishman kicked 'em one side with his boot, and offered the boy a ten cent stamp. The little feller looked at him and says, 'Say; see here. This won't do. Them crabs is two dollars a dozen; them is. Them's shedders; them is.' The Englishman at first thought the boy was trying to cheat him, but when I explained the thing to him he gave the boy a dollar and said. 'Blawst my bloody heyes if I believe I'll get a dollar's worth of fish.' I went into the house and the boy cleared out, but I watched the Englishman out of the window. He looked at the crabs about five minutes. Then he deliberately went off and lugged a couple of big stones up to the crabs. Then he took the stones and mashed up the crabs. The first thing I knew he had his bag on the ground and began drawing the joints of his pole out. There were about twenty joints, and when he got all the joints fitted into the sockets it was the d—dest looking pole that you ever saw. It reached half
 way down to Harlem. Then he went into his leather valise and
GOT OUT A REEL.
It was a wooden reel. It would fill a barrel and looked like an old fashioned spinning wheel. Well, when I saw that reel I thought I'd die. I went out to the Englishman and took a look at it. He looked as though he was going to ketch all the fish in the river. 'What kind of a rod is that?' says I. He says, 'That's the rod that I catch sawmon with. Hit's a beauty, hisn't it?' 'Yes,' says I, 'it's a beauty. I never saw one like it before.' 'No.' he says, 'the Hamericans don't know 'ow to make fishink rods.' Then he picked up his crabs and his green bag an' his valise, an' he sailed off up onto the bridge, until he got alongside of old Judge Smith, who sat there awastin' crabs, drinkin' out of a black bottle, and occasionally drawin' in a small fish. You'd ought to have seen the look on the old Judge's face when he saw the Englishman's rod. 'Catching hanythink?' says the Englishman to the Judge. 'Putty fair luck,' the Judge said, and added: 'That's a great rod you got there.' 'Yes,' answered the Englishman, as if he was tickled at the Judge's observation, ''tis a great rod.' The Judge said: 'I'd be a little careful with that rod if I were in your place.' 'Why?' said the Englishman, apparently alarmed. 'Do you think hanybody would steal it?' 'No,' says the Judge, 'but if you go to flingin' it around in the sky too wild, you might knock the points off of some of the stars.' Well, the Englishman, he didn't like that. He turned to me and said that
THE JUDGE WAS A GUYING HIM.
Then he rigged up a hook, put a piece of mashed crab on it, looked around behind him, and give the rod a swing. He had a good, heavy sinker on. I told him he wanted a heavy sinker, because the tide was strong. Well, the old reel went to bouncin', and the bait flew a quarter of a mile down the river, when all of a sudden the line kinked, and away went the mashed crab. I could see it strike the 'butment of the Harlem bridge. But the Englishman, he didn't know it. He thought it was all right. He set down and waited for two hours, as patient as any man you ever see, for a bite. Finally I told him that I guessed he didn't have any bait onto his hook, and he began to turn his spinnin' wheel to get his line in. It took him a quarter of an hour to reach the hook. 'Blawst my bloody heyes,' he said 'if they bain't got the bait.' 'Why,' says I, 'your bait didn't stay on. I saw it fly off the hook 'fore it reached the water.' He looked at me kinder reproachful like, but he didn't say a word. Then he went down into his leather valise again and pulled out a piece of string. Then he picked up a little mashed crab and tied it on to the hook. He was about six foot high, with yeller side whiskers, thin as a rail, and when he got up with that white plug hat and that little rim, and went to throw out again he was the most perfect scarecrow that you ever saw. He give her a send with all his might, and the bait struck just under Harlem bridge. In about a minute he had a bite. You'd oughter seen
OLD JUDGE SMITH.
I thought he'd split himself a laughin'. The Englishman's fish was a heavy one. He pulled like a border ruffian. I thought it was a border ruffian first. He kept yanking away at that old wooden reel about fifteen minutes, and then the fish began to come up out of the water. What do you think it was?"
Reporter—Was it a dog fish?
Florence the Pirate (laughing)—No. It was the biggest toad-fish that
 I ever saw. It would have weighed three pounds and a half if it weighed an ounce. Well, the Englishman got him on to the bridge, and old Judge Smith and me, we kept a watchin' him. The hook was clear down the fish's throat The Englishman held him up by his line and looked in the fish's mouth. Then he grabbed him by the belly with his left hand, and stuck his right hand into his mouth to git out the hook. The toad-fish closed on him like a vise. Judge Smith looked up very quiet and says, "Have you got him?" "Yes." says the Englishman, "and blawst my bloody heyes, hif he bain't got me." If you'd 'a seen him you'd 'a died a laughing. He got up on his tiptoes and tried to get his hand out of the fish's mouth. But the toad-fish held on like a Methodist minister on to a convert, and wouldn't let go. The Britisher began to dance, and the first thing you knew away went his pole, wooden reel and all, off the bridge. The Judge and me, we sot like knots on a log, looking into the water. After about ten minutes
THE ENGLISHMAN GOT THE FISH DOWN
on to the bridge and put his big foot on him. Then he got out his pocket-knife and went to work at him. It took him fifteen minutes to get his fingers out, and when he did get 'em out they looked as though they'd been run through a threshin' machine. He would 'em up in his handkerchief and began to pull in his line. The hook was still in the fish's mouth. I believe there was at least a thousand feet of line before the reel gave to the rod, but he finally got the rod up. Then he cut the hook from the line and worked the line on to the reel. Then he unjointed his rod, put it in the green bag, chucked his spinnin' wheel into his valise and sailed down the lane at a 2:40 gait without saying a word to any one, leavin' the toad fish and the hook within two feet of Judge Smith's basket. Then Judge Smith and me, we emptied the black bottle, and the Judge laughed so loud that the people came runnin' over from Morrisania to see what was the matter."
Here Mr. Florence killed a bushel of mosquitoes and went to bed.
AFTER SHEEPSHEAD.
The reporter slept upon a bedtick filled with corncobs, and dreamed of pinhooks and thousand pound bass. All night long the melancholy groaning of the surf was heard. In the morning he was up ahead of the sun. The Pirate Florence arose at the same time, and immediately opened hostilities upon the mosquitoes, varying the warfare by an attack upon Mr. Cox's applejack.
"The tide will be right in about an hour an a half now for the sheepshead," he said, as he lighted his morning pipe.
"Are you sure of catching any?" asked the reporter.
"Oh, yes, lots uv 'em," was the reply. "All you've got to do is to foller me, an I'll put you right on to the ground. You can fill a boat with 'em in two hours. All you want is some soft clams. You don't open the shell, you know, but jest stick your hook into the mouth uv the clam, and chuck it overboard with a heavy sinker, and the fust thing you know you'll feel a heavy tug at the hook. That's the sheepshead a mashin' the clam in his teeth. When he gits to suckin' the clam out he'll give the hook another tug, an' then's the time that you want to give a jerk an' fasten him." [Here Mr. Florence came to close quarters with a gallynipper, and upset his pipe, setting his overalls on fire, and creating a commotion generally.]
After breakfast the Pirate got his traps together, boarded a tiny catboat at the wharf, told the SUN reporter to follow him, hoisted sail, and sped for the sheepshead ground. His boat was so light that she ran like a water-spider over sand bars covered with scarcely two inches of water. In half an hour the Pirate was anchored near the Light, and began fishing.
ON THE GROUNDS.
The reporter attempted to follow him in his Jersey lugger, but she drew so much water that the skipper protested. He tacked this way and that, avoiding a bar here and there, and banged about the bay like a floating wash tub. He sailed at least ten miles, and was not able to swing-to under the Light until nearly 11, A. M. The Pirate had then been fishing about four hours. His nose was redder than usual, but he was remarkably quiet, and did not speak until spoken to. As the lugger lowered her sail and dropped anchor, the reporter shouted, "What luck, Mr. Florence?"
"Well, so, so—pretty fair; but they ain't a bitin' much," was the response.
Reporter—Have you caught any?
Florence the Pirate—Yes, a few; but they ain't a bitin' much.
Reporter—What do you catch?
The Pirate—Well, a few, that's all. They ain't a bitin' much.
Reporter—Have you caught any sheepshead?
Mr. Florence (very quietly)—Sheepshead? Well, yes, I've got one or two. They ain't a bitin' much though.
Reporter—Hold up your string. Let me see them.
Mr. Florence arose from his seat very deliberately, went to the stern of his boat and with the greatest difficulty pulled out of the water the finest string of sheepshead that the reporter ever saw. There were eight of them, weighing from twelve to fifteen pounds apiece. Their white teeth glistened in the sunlight like pearls. Mr. Florence exhibited them with an air of quiet triumph, and consoled the reporter by telling him that he caught them all within an hour, and that they had stopped biting two hours before.
Then the reporter began to fish. The tide was so strong that an old-fashioned clock weight would have floated like a cork. Still the reporter fished, occasionally pulling in a sea-bass about the size of a smelt, but beyond this nothing. Half an hour later
THE PIRATE HOISTED SAIL,
and ran alongside the lugger.
"There's no use uv your fishin' here any longer," he said; "the tide's wrong, and you won't git a sheepshead bite if you sit here all day. I'm a goin' over to the weakfish ground. If you'll foller me you can fill your boat with weakers inside uv an hour."
"I didn't come down to Barnegat Bay to catch weakfish," answered the reporter. "I can catch plenty of them nearer New York."
The Pirate—Well, don't be a fool. The tide's wrong. You can't catch any sheepshead on this tide. You've got to come early in the mornin' for those fellers.
Reporter (resignedly)—Well, I shall stay here a week but what I shall catch some of them.
Florence—You better come with me. A weaker's a game fish, and you can't have better sport.
The reporter again declined. Florence spent twenty minutes in a vain
 effort to coax him away, and finally shot off for the weakfish ground in his winged catboat.
MURDER WILL OUT.
After fishing for three hours, catching nothing but a dogfish, the reporter took a small boat, and went ashore. He found a one-legged hotel near the lighthouse, and entered the bar-room. A frowsy-looking, barefooted wrecker, in a red flannel shirt, stood leaning on the bar, and gazing sleepily at the bottles behind the bar-keeper:
"Will you take something?" asked the reporter.
"Y-a-s," drawled the wrecker, turning to the bartender. "Gimme sum cider sperrets, Tommy."
Tommy handed down the bottle. The wrecker filled a pint tumbler to the brim with apple jack, and raised it to his mouth. It disappeared like magic. The reporter sarcastically asked the wrecker if he wouldn't try another glass.
"Y-a-s," he answered. "Gimme sum more cider sperrets, Tommy."
The pint tumbler was again filled and emptied. The wrecker wiped his mouth on the sleeve of his red flannel shirt, and looked at the reporter for the first time.
"Is there any fishing around here?" asked the reporter.
"Y-a-s, if you know how to fish," the wrecker replied. "Gurcy purchy fish poles hain't much good here."
"What do you catch around here?" the reporter inquired.
"Y-a-s. You catch what gits holt uv your hook if you know how to fish," he answered. "Bluefish, bass, fluke, weakfish, sheepshead—"
Reporter (interrupting)—Did you ever catch any sheepshead here?
Wrecker—Y-a-s. I catched eight on 'em out in the inlet this morning.
Reporter—Where are they?
Wrecker—Sold 'em to a fat red-nosed Yorker for thirty cents a pound.
That was enough. The reporter hoisted sail, and landed at Secor's Hotel, Tom's river.
The Pirate arrived in New York that night, and distributed the sheepshead among his friends. He told them that he didn't have much luck, and left them with the impression that it was a very common thing for him to run out and pull in thirty or forty sheepshead in an hour.—
N. Y. Sun
MAD.—One of the baggage masters of a station between Worcestor and Boston, is a fat, good-natured, droll fellow, whose jokes have become quite popular on the road. His name is Bill. A short time since, while in the performance of his duties in checking baggage, an ugly little Scotch terrier got in his way, and he gave him a smart kick, which sent him over the track yelling. The owner of the dog soon appeared in high dudgeon wanting to know why he kicked the dog. "Was that your dog!" asked Bill, with the usual drawl. "Certainly it was! what right had you to kick him?" "He's mad," said Bill. "No, he's not mad, either," said the owner. "Well, I should be if anybody kicked me in that way," responded Bill.
A man died in Seneca Falls, N. Y., the other day, and in his will he left "that old liar and tattler, the Widow Jones, two cents."
BILLIARD HINTS.
Persons who desire to become expert billiardists would do well to peruse the following with extreme care:
The first point to be observed in the game is the point of the cue. Keep it well chalked by all means. The best means is chalk.
In taking aim, let your eye run along the cue. If it won't run, use an onion.
Avoid the use of a bridge, you will soon learn to get along swimmingly without one.
Pay a great deal of attention to grace. Should Grace decline your attentions, there are plenty of other girls.
Don't sit on the cushion between shots. The cushion is not made to sit on. If you sit on the cushion how can the Balls hit on the cushion.
If you wish to shine as a billiardist you must endeavor to take the shine out of every other player.
Play cautiously and mind your P's and Cues.
Don't allow yourself to get nervous; always endeavor to be Carme.
Don't use the bottle to much while nursing the balls.
Make a point of making all the points you can.
If a lady should propose a match to you, it would be the height of rudeness to refuse.
Deal gently with the covering of the table. Billiard room proprietors will stand wear but not tear.
If asked to play off, you had better decline to play on, unless you desire to get stuck.
Young players, not yet out of leading strings, should practice stringing for the lead.
On no account count more than you ought to count.
Don't attempt too difficult shots at first. Learn by degrees, starting with about 45 degrees. When you get up to 90° Fahrenheit, you will be able to make it pretty hot for your opponent.
Avoid misses. Of course I don't mean by this that you are to shun the society of young ladies.
If your head is level you'll play on the "Bevel."—"
Billiard Cue
."
Dean Alford tells of a Scotch lad in a military school who went up with a drawing of Venice, which he had just finished, to show it to the master. Observing that he had printed the name under it with two "n's" ("Vennice"), the master said, "Don't you know that there's only one '
hen
' in 'Venice!'" "Only one hen in Venice!" exclaimed young Sandy, with astonishment; "I'm thinking they'll no hae mony eggs, then."
"Wife," said a man, looking for his razor-case, "I have places where I keep my things, and you ought to know it." "Yes," said she, "I ought to know where you keep your late hours."
A Manufacturer advertises a patent shoe that will prevent horses from "balling." Spiner says this is not a new idea, as Mrs. S. has used a shoe often to stop the young Spiner's bawling.
A DIFFICULT SHOT.
W. H. COLLENDER, Manufacturer of Standard American Bevel Billiard Tables, 738 Broadway, New York.
ILLUSTRATED CATALOGUE SENT BY MAIL ON APPLICATION.
A MOTHER-IN-LAW'S FAST RIDE.
JOE S. is the fortunate possessor of a mother-in-law, and, what he probably thought more of, among his horses was one known as Quaker. Now Quaker was a good roadster, and could and would jerk a wagon with two in it in 2:51 on the road, and the harder he was pulled in, and the more he was yelled at, the faster he meant to go. In fact, when a competing horse ranged alongside, and a strong pull was taken, accompanied by yells, he thought he must do his level best on trotting, and you bet he did it. Not many years ago, when the county fair was held where Master Joe then lived, he had his old Quaker hitched up to a 130-pound three-quarter seated wagon, and, as he was getting in, mother-in-law wished to go with him. He informed her that he was going to the Town Clerk's office, at the lower end of the village (about a mile), and if she was in a hurry to return, she would have to drive back alone, and then cramped the wagon for her admittance; and with head drooping and slouching gait, old Quaker walked along, taking the ill-assorted pair to the Town Clerk's office. Now, be it known, Joe dearly loves fun, and will have it as often as possible, while mother-in-law is a rigid, old-fashioned sky-blue Baptist, undoubtedly very good, but unfortunately possessed with the idea that to laugh is to sin. It so happened that every team at that time was going to the fair grounds, or else was walking; so Quaker had no chance to "score up," but just as they arrived at the office of the Town Clerk, S. saw Jake Barnes coming on his way to the fair. Now Jake's mare has the reputation of being four or five seconds faster than old Quaker. To turn Quaker around, jump out and advise mother-in-law to drive slow going home, was but a minute's work; and then holding up his hand to attract Jake's attention, he told him he would pay chicken fixings and et ceteras if he would range alongside Quaker at full speed, yell, and spirit the old horse to the street to the Fair Ground entrance. A nod, and Jake touches Lady Cutler with his whip, sings out "get!" and lays for Quaker, who, hearing the stepper coming, grabs at his bit. Mother-in-law takes hold of reins in front of the buttons, puts her feet against brace-iron in front, and as the Lady ranges alongside, Jake yelling lively, mother-in-law takes her strongest pull, screaming "whoa!" to stop her "animile." But he didn't stop—not much—he didn't. The pull was just enough to steady him good; "whoa" he evidently considered to be a sell to the other horse, and squatted to go his level best, and just did it. Now you bet! Barnes was actually getting left behind, and warming up to his work commenced in right good earnest to sing out, "Hi yarr! Go er 'lang! What are you about? Git! won't yer?" And they did git, nice, both on 'em. The people they passed, seeing their speed, and the old lady's hat on the back of her neck, the shawl streaming out behind, and the courage with which she hung on to the lines, clapped their hands and encouragingly sang out—"Good, old girl!—Gay old bird!—'2:40!'—Bully for old Quaker!" And as they passed the two hotels, the fast boys on the piazzas gave them three cheers with a vim—in fact with several extra vims.
Joe's mother-in-law took the first evening train for her Green Mountain home. His parting words were, "he should not dare allow her to drive Quaker again, as he had cautioned her to drive slow, and she had gone and beaten one of the fastest horses in town."
AN ACTOR'S TRICK.
STOCK actors in theatres when allowed a benefit make the most of it. The actor whose regular salary may be from $10 to $25 per week has, on this occasion, one half of the entire receipts of the house. He is supposed, through the influence of his friends, to increase those receipts to double what they usually are. To do this they must, unless they have a number, resort to expedients not usually recognized as legitimate. An actor in the West being given a benefit, issued a couple of thousand tickets entitling the bearer to "free admission to the boxes on his benefit night." These tickets were assiduously dropped at every cross road, tavern and grocery for some few miles in the vicinity on the night previous to the benefit. The bait took; and fellows and their gals might have been seen advancing on the good old town "'ere evening shadows fell." The doors of the theatre were regularly besieged by the pleasure seeking rustics. When the doors were open, and a stout policeman or two had been prudently picketed at the point of the entrance, a rush was made in order to get the best seats in the house, as is always the case with your constitutional dead head.
To portray the mingled phases of astonishment, anger, and honest indignation of the liberal patrons of the rustic drama when they were severally informed by the urbane and gentlemanly door keeper that all those red tickets were 
frauds
 (and, indeed, as the reader knows, his information was strictly true) is beyond the power of my feeble quill. As most of the young fellows were accompanied by their sisters, and sweethearts (for the supply of gratuitous paste-board had been diffused on a most liberal scale), it would seem shabby to back out without seeing the show. So, with many a rueful expression while fumbling for evasive quarters, and many whispered solicitations for temporary accommodations, they filed in, pair after pair, and filled the little theatre to its utmost capacity.
To cap the climax of the theatrical audacity, the beneficiary himself, between the pieces, stepped in front of the curtain with a pack of the rejected tickets in his hand, and in a most eloquent speech, denounced the contemptible scoundrel or scoundrels who had attempted to injure him by such outrageous imposition on the public. In the whole course of his professional experience, whether in England, Australia, California or America, he had never been so grossly insulted, "and," continued he, warming to his work, "if the cowardly blackguard or blackguards are in front of this house to night, I dare them to meet me at the door of the theatre, and I will give them each and all any satisfaction for the language I have used. Aye," he concluded, shaking his fist defiantly at a harmless medalion of Shakespeare that decorated the front of the second tier, "and at any time and in any way they may select."
This plucky demonstration won all hearts and prolonged applause greeted the injured stranger as he proudly, defiantly and slowly bowed himself off. That young man has been a financial success, and still lives "a prosperous gentleman."
FIRST REVELER (on being turned out of the Caledonian Club): "Come and take a glass at my rooms." SECOND REVELER: "Na, na, ah've had mair than enouch!" FIRST REVELER: "Hoots! Tak' anither mun! D'ye no see ye're lettin' yer judgment get the better of ye?"
HER LAST WORDS.—When old Mrs. Maxwell of Bethlehem died, her family and friends gathered at her bedside in terrible anguish, weeping and moaning.
Her niece stood by her and held her hand, and, as the lamp flickered before it was finally extinguished, she said to her:
"Is there anything that we can do to make your dying moments happier? Have you any unfulfilled wish, any cherished design, which we can carry out? Shall we do anything for you when you are gone?"
Mrs. Maxwell turned her face toward her niece, and, with a faltering voice, said:
"Mariar, don't give none of them preserved plums to John Henry. they always disagreed with his stomach."
Then her freed spirit took its eternal flight.
BAYARD TAYLOR relates a droll instance of the readiness and sharpness of Mr. Greeley at repartee: There used to be a paper in this city called the 
Evening Mirror
, edited by Hiram Fuller, now of London. He imagined his little sheet to be the most important journal in the city, and was in the habit of asking his acquaintances, "Have you read the 
Mirror
 to day?" At an editorial dinner, he addressed this question to Mr. Greeley in my presence. Mr. G., with an indescribable drawl, almost a whine, replied "Why, no; I never buy the 
Mirror
. I'm afraid of exhausting the edition!"
The latest patent has been taken out by a railway restaurateur. It is for a reversible gutta-percha beefsteak, which can be fried and served up four times a day for a year, before it requires renewal.
A Wisconsin jury found that, "deceased came to his death from calling Bill Jackson a liar."
"Wife, do you know that I have got the pneumonia?" "New monia, indeed! Such extravagance! You're the spendthriftiest man I ever did see! To go and lay out money for such thrash, when I need a new bonnet so much."
The last English comic song has a really comic jingle for its refrain recalling the punning chorus of "I saw Esau kissing Kate." Thus it runs: 
Say so, Sue, Saucy Sue,
Never leave me to sigh so, Sue;
If you love me, Sau-cy Sue,
Wouldn't it be better for to say so, Sue?
PRECEDENCE.—That was not a bad reply given recently at a barn-raising in Pennsylvania to a young man who had been relating his more than wonderful exploits in various quarters of the globe. At the close of one of the narratives, he was not a little set back by the remark of an old cod: "Young man, aint you ashamed to talk so when there are older liars on the ground.
COURT DECORUM IN NEVADA.
The deference usually accorded to judicial dignitaries in the older sections of the country was not conspicuous in the early days of Nevada, judging from a scene that occurred in one of the lively towns of that region, related to us by one of the pillars of the Nevada bar.
On one occasion, court having been formerly opened, counsel in the first case called took exceptions to the ruling of the court on a certain point, and a dispute arose.
"If the court please, I wish to refer to this book a moment," picking up a law-book.
"No use referring to any books; I've decided the p'int," responded the court.
"But, your honor—"
"Now I don't want to hear anything further on the subject. I tell you I've decided the p'int."
"I tell you you are wrong," retorted the counsel
"I am right," reiterated the court.
"I say you ain't," persisted the counsel.
"Crier!" yelled the judge, "I adjourn this court for ten minutes.
And, jumping from the bench, he pitched into the counsel, and after a lively little fight placed him 
hors du combat,
 after which business was resumed. But soon another misunderstanding arose.
"Crier!" said the court, "we will adjourn this time for twenty-minutes."
And he was about taking off his coat, when the counsel said:
"Never mind judge; keep your seat. The p'int is yielded. My thumb's out o' j'int, and I've sprained my shoulder."
The court resumed her ermine.
A CHINESE servant was brought home by the gentleman of the house, and his mistress inquired his name. "Yung Hoo Wing." "Oh," said she, "I cannot call you that; I will call you Charley." "Whatee your name?" he asked in return. "My name is Mrs. John Browning." "Welle, I calle you John!" exclaimed the Celestial.
JOHN VAN DAHM, of Fort Wayne, says the Cleveland 
Leader
, was playing with a pistol in his house the other day, when it went off and made an eye-let hole in his hip. If he was named Jones he might be called a Jones fool; if his name was Smith he might be called a Smith fool: but, unhappily, his is another name.
AN exchange has the following observation: "We always get mad when we walk along a street about 9 o'clock, and passing a shaded porch where a young man is bidding his beloved a good night, hear the girl exclaim in a loud whisper, 'Oh, stop, George, you haven't shaved.'"
A UTICA boy, who attempted to amputate a cat's tail, found that the absence of the old woman who owns the cat is necessary to the perfect success of such an experiment.
SEWING BUTTONS.—The Danbury News is the best digestive pill that has yet been discovered. Here is an item concerning buttons that should be read immediately after dinner, or late supper, and is warranted to make the reader proof against dyspepsia: It is bad enough to see a bachelor sew on a button, but he is the embodiment of grace alongside of a married man. Necessity has compelled experience in the case of the former, but the latter has always depended upon some one else for this service, and fortunately, for the sake of society, it is rarely he is obliged to resort to the needle himself. Sometimes the patient wife scalds her right hand, or runs a sliver under the nail of the index finger of that hand, and it is then the man clutches the needle around the neck, and forgetting to tie a knot in the thread, commences to put on the button. It is always in the morning, and from five to twenty minutes after he is expected to be down in the street. He lays the button exactly on the site of its predecessor, and carefully draws the thread after, leaving about three inches of it sticking up for the lee way. He says to himself: "Well, if women don't have the easiest time I ever see."
Then he comes back the other way, and gets the needle through the cloth well enough, and lays himself out to find the eye, but in spite of a great deal of patient jabbing, the needle point persists in bucking against the solid part of that button, and finally, when he loses patience, his finger catches the thread, and that three inches he had left to hold the button slips through the eye in a twinkling, and the button rolls leisurely across the floor. He picks it up without a single remark, out of respect to his children, and makes another attempt to fasten it. This time when coming back with the needle he keeps both the thread and button from slipping by covering them with his thumb and it is out of regard for that part of him that he feels around for the eye in a very careful and judicious manner, but eventually loses his philosophy as the search becomes more and more hopeless, and falls to jabbing about in a loose and savage manner, and it is just then the needle finds the opening, and comes up through the button and part way through his thumb with a celerity that no human ingenuity can guard against. Then he lays down the things, with a familiar quotation, and presses the injured hand between his knees, then holds it under the other arm, and finally jams it into his mouth, and all the while he prances about the floor and calls upon heaven and earth to witness that there has never been anything like it since the world was created, and howls, and whistles, and moans, and sobs. After awhile he calms down and puts on his pants, and fastens them together with a stick, and goes to his business a changed man.
A COLORED PHILOSOPHER thus unburdened himself on one of woman's weaknesses: "Jim, de men don't make such fools of demselves about women as de women do about men. If women look at de moon, dey see a man in it. If dey hear a mouse nibbling, it's a man; and dey all look under de bed de last thing at night to find a man. Why, I neber look under my bed to find a woman, does you?"
A rural gentleman standing over a register in a Danbury store attracted general attention to himself by observing to his wife: "Mariar, I guess I'm going to have a fever, I feel such hot streaks a runnin' up my legs."
The Danbury 
News
 gives the following quaint descriptions of domestic incidents:
PERSUADING A HEN.—When a woman has a hen to drive into the coop, she takes hold of her hoops with both hands, and shakes them quietly toward the delinquent, and says; "Shew! there." The hen takes one look at the object to convince herself that it's a woman, and then stalks majestically into the coop in perfect disgust of her sex. A man don't do that way. He goes out of doors and says: "It's singular nobody in this house can drive a hen but myself." and picking up a piece of wood, hurls it at the offending biped, and observes, "Get in there, you thief." The hen immediately loses her reason, and dashes to the opposite end of the yard. The man straightway dashes after her. She comes back again with her head down, her wings out, and followed by an assortment of stove wood, and fruit cans and coal clinkers, with a much puffing and very mad man in the rear. Then she skims up on the stoop, and under the barn, and over a fence or two, and around the house, and back again to the coop, all the while talking as only an excited hen can talk, and all the while followed by things convenient for handling, and by a man whose coat is on the saw buck and whose hat is on the ground, and whose perspiration and profanity appear to have no limit. By this time the other hens have come out to take a hand in the debate, and help dodge the missiles—and then the man says every hen on the place shall be sold in the morning, and puts on his things and goes down street, and the woman dons her hoops and has every one of these hens housed and contented in two minutes, and the only sound heard on the premises is the hammering by the oldest boy as he mends the broken pickets.
THE FAMILY HAMMER.—There is one thing no family pretends to do without. That is a hammer. And yet there is nothing that goes to make up the equipment of a domestic establishment that causes one half as much agony and profanity as a hammer. It is always an old hammer, with a handle that is inclined to sliver, and always bound to slip. The face is as round as a full moon and as smooth as glass. When it strikes a nail full and square, which it has been known to do, the act will be found to result from a combination of pure accidents. The family hammer is one of those rare articles we never profit by. When it glides off a nail head, and mashes down a couple of fingers, we unhesitatingly deposit it in the yard, and observe that we will never use it again. But the blood has hardly dried on the rag before we are out doors in search of that hammer, and ready to make another trial. The result rarely varies, but we never profit by it. The awful weapon goes on knocking off our nails, and mashing whole joints, and slipping off the handle to the confusion of mantel ornaments, and breaking the commandments, and cutting up an assortment of astounding and unfortunate antics, without let or hindrance. And yet we put up with it, and put the handle on again, and lay it away where it won't get lost, and do up our mutilated and smarting fingers; and yet if the outrageous thing should happen to get lost we kick up a regular hullabooloo until it is found again. Talk about the tyranizing influence of a bad habit! It is not to be compared to the family hammer.
PUTTING A HOOP ON THE FAMILY FLOUR BARREL is an operation that will hardly bear an encore. The woman generally attempts it before the man comes home to dinner.
She sets the hoop up on the end of the staves, takes a deliberate aim with the rolling-pin, and then shutting both eyes, bring the pin down with all the force of one arm, while the other instinctively shields her face.
Then she makes a dive for the camphor and unbleached muslin, and when the man comes home she is sitting back of the stove, thinking of St. Stephen and the other martyrs, while a burnt dinner and the camphor are struggling heroically for the mastery.
He says if she had kept her temper she wouldn't have got hurt.
And he visits the barrel himself, and puts the hoop on very carefully, and adjusts it so nicely to the top of every stave that only a few smart knocks apparently are needed to bring it down all right, then he laughs to himself to think what a fuss his wife kicked up over a simple matter that only needed a little patience to adjust itself, and then he gets the hammer, and fetches the hoop a short rap on one side, and the other flies up, and catches him on the bridge of the nose, filling his soul with wrath and his eyes with tears, and the next instant that barrel is flying across the room, accompanied by the hammer, and another candidate for camphor and rag is enrolled in the great army that is unceasingly marching toward the grave.
THEY WOULDN'T FIGHT THAT WAY.—About the commencement of the war Judge Rice made a speech in South Alabama, in which he said that the Southern soldiers could whip the Yankees with pop-guns. Since the war he chanced to make another speech at the same place.
A big, double-jointed fellow was present, who heard and remembered the former speech, and being in no amiable frame of mind, concluded to go for Sam.
Rolling up his sleeves and popping his flat in the palm of his hand, he propounded the fearful question:
"Sam Rice, didn't you make a speech here in 1861?"
"I did," said Sam.
"And didn't you say we could whip the Yankees with pop-guns?
"Certainly I did, but the rascals wouldn't fight us that way!"
AN Englishman and a German were traveling together in a diligence, and both smoking. The German did all in his power to draw his companion into conversation, but to no purpose; at one moment he would, with a superabundance of politeness, apologize for drawing his attention to the fact that the ash of his cigar had fallen on his waistcoat, or a spark was endangering his neckerchief. At length the Englishman exclaimed, "Why the dickens can't you leave me alone? Your coat tail has been burning for the last ten minutes, but I didn't bother you about it."
CAUGHT.—The misery of being called upon suddenly to make a speech was got over by a mathematician, who delivered himself in this fashion: "Gentlemen, a morbid desire for originality prevents me from saying, 'This is the proudest moment of my life,' and it does not occur to me to say anything else."
MY FORENOON WITH THE BABY.
SOME fiend breathed ill-timed and ill-fated benevolence into my heart. Satan is like scrofula, he always seizes a man by the weakest part of his constitution.
"I'll tell you, Aunt Fanny," I said, under the impulse, with the joyous smile of one who brings relief at a crisis, "go you to church with uncle and the boys. You must not lose this fine day. 
I'll take care of the baby.
"
Aunt Fanny looked at me with some little doubt.
"Oh, yes," I said, with calm and confident dignity, "of course I can. Just as if a man of my size couldn't take care of a baby for three hours! Besides, I know exactly what to do. I've seen you do it more than a hundred times. And children always like me."
If my Aunt Fanny had had but this one only darling, she would have seen me in—Hackensack before she would have done it. But Sammy was her ninth (all the rest being, by various accidents, absent, or to be absent, that morning); and I have noticed that where there are so many, people don't think 
quite
 so much of them per head. What I mean is by no means that maternal love is like a dish of beans, to be divided about in smaller messes as there are more to partake of it, but only this—that the experienced mother finds out that her little ones are really safer then she used to think they were, and can be trusted sometimes to competent guardians—like me.
"Well," said she, at last, "baby's a dood yitty ting (warn't oo, baby?), and if I put him to sleep before I go, perhaps he won't wake up until we get back. I'll try you, for once."
So my small cousin was nicely arrayed in some mysterious but clean white garments, the details of whose arrangement I did not see, as donated with (as they say about gifts to infant colleges; 
ergo
, why not to infants, though the phrase be insufferable?) a bounteous repast of—from—by—in short, the maternal fount (I thank you, Mr. Micawber!), and soothed with gentle oscillation and oft-repeated chanting of that wonderous, ancient rhyme or magic song which commences with an allusion to our country's flag, to wit, 
"By-lo baby 
bunting;
"
 and thus was the young immortal prosperously dismissed within the peaceful realms of Dreamland. Then my Aunt Fanny adorned herself with speed, and forthwith the old, lean, over-worked farm-horse shambled off down the sun-shiny summer road toward the church, two miles and more away. As she stepped over the threshold she looked back for an instant, and some shadows flitted indistinctly across her face. 
Was it a presentiment?
Human prosperity is a deceitful thing. I passed half an hour in profound quiet, reading by the open window, in the sweet summer air, in the leafy solitude of the remote farm, in a stillness so complete that the buzzing of a fly across the pane, or the motion or fall of one leaf from the tall trees in the darkly-shaded door-yard, was a noticeable event. I had been perusing a sermon from that stately work, "Theology Explained and Defended, in a Series of Sermons, by TIMOTHY DWIGHT, S. T. D., LL. D." The grave,
 elaborate fancifulness of the old President's descriptions, their formal and sonorous periodicity of phrase, not without the recognizable decent sermonic idioms, bore an efficient analogy to the solemnity of the day; and I lingered long in pleasant imaginings over "thirdly" of the Remarks, Sermon XXII., ON MAN.
"They were companions of angels," saith the great New England Doctor, speaking of Adam and Eve in Paradise, "and shared their conversation, their friendship, and their joys. Alike were they free from pain, sickness, sorrow, and death; safe from fear and hatred, injustic and cruelty; and superior to meanness, sloth, intemperance, and pollution. They were also immortal; were destined to dwell in a perpetual Eden; were surrounded always by beauty, life, and fragrance; and were employed only in knowing, loving, and enjoying."
It was a pretty thought, that. I was in a sort of paradise, with a little angel for my companion; and as I gazed upon the sleeping child, I felt "no end" of benignity, universal friendship, and pure delight, in having attained to the honor of so lovely an office of superintendence.
"Yah!"
Thus remarked my darling Sammy; suddenly waking up and writhing about, and digging in a helpless, wavering manner at his eyes with his fists. At that very moment it occurred to me that really I never had one minute's intercourse with him, and that possibly he might be an exception to the rule which I had laid down that all children liked me—in fact, he was.
I mentioned that some fiend had, doubtless, inspired me with my benevolence. As nearly as I can calculate, it was now that the said fiend did, in my opinion, leave me, and enter into that baby. As the above mentioned suggestion about Sammy's exceptional disposition towards me arose in my mind, an expression of confusion appeared upon my face—I remember it accurately. This Sammy perceived as I arose, and, with what I fancied an unexceptionable demonstration of paternal rapture, approached the cradle of my chubby and innocent companion angel.
"Ah, oo pooty yitty ting! Did he want to tum and see his tuzen? So he should!"
I appeal to every mother's heart, is not that a first-class blandishment? I can't print the affecting drawl that I put into it, the recitative style and 
portamente di voce
 with which I garnished it 
secundum artem
. But as far as types, will show it, I contend that the very mother of Moses, if you like, couldn't have turned out a more superior article of verbal endearment.
The baby listened with some complacency to my dulcet tones; and encouraged by my success, I thought it proper to communicate to him the peculiar circumstances which rendered me his guardian for the time. Thus, therefore, to him, I:
"Ha, pooty! Was oo muzzer au gone oo church? Es ee was! An lef oo wiz oo tuzen Freddy (my baptismal name is Frederic) all ee morning? Ha-a-a-a, ketcher, ketcher, ketcher, ketcher, ketcher! Ha-a-a-a, prrrrrrrr! Jiggle, jiggle, jiggle!"
Not being quite satisfied with the expression of Master Sammy's minute features during the first half of this address, I began somewhat to doubt my ability to communicate with him in language half baby and half English, and, therefore, I repeated my statement as above, in pure baby, as near as I can judge, pointing at him in a free and jovial manner during the words, "Ha, ketcher," etc. making a kind of swoop at him with outspread fingers
 during the remark, "Ha, prrr," etc., and smiling very sweetly indeed at the word "jiggle."
As I said, in despite of the profound theory and masterly execution of this manoeuvre, I did not perform it without a secret and embarrassing apprehension. The evil spirit in the child—for no mere human baby could have failed to respond to such affectionate approaches—perceived this hidden misery of mine, and took instant advantage thereof; namely, by returning, not demonstrations of reciprocal affection, but what I may truly call 
demon
-strations of auger, unmingled except with fear and aversion. While I spoke and stuck out my paws at him (for I will admit that my gestures may have been susceptible of that interpretation), Master Sammy preserved an ominous silence, a grave and attentive expression, and entire quiet—only opening his eyes and likewise his mouth. But no sooner had I ended, and made as though I would actually lift him from the cradle, than he looked hastily about after his mother. She not being forthcoming, a species of fearful contortion passed over his visage—his mouth opened to an extent unparalleled in my experience, occupying a space that left no room for the rest of his face, which was, therefore, shriveled or heaped up together in a little pile of wrinkles in the region of the bridge of the nose—no eyes whatever being visible, and only two little pink holes indicating the "smellatory organ," as Mrs. Baggles hath it—and from this preternatural orifice he discharged such a shriek as really hit me on the forehead and knocked me straight up again into a frightened perpendicular. It didn't stop either—it continued. I had no idea there was so much noise in any thing. This was evidently a diabolic energy. A child would have had to breathe, but this phenomenon didn't. Its whole being resolved itself into shriek. The mere fat human baby of a moment before was transmuted into a sorcerer's thing—a kind of a live Teraph; a mere Institution for the Promotion of Awful Noises.
I think I stood, astounded and incapable of action for a minute. And really, now that I am retrospecting the thing, in what a fix was I! Well-meaning, but absurdly ignorant young bachelor that I was, how was I calculated, either by nature or art, for assuaging the dire alarms of an unweaned child—much more for dealing with such an instance of precocious demoniac possession as this? 
Conjuro te
 would not tell on a baby, nor 
By-lo baby bunting
 on an imp.
All that, however, I had no leisure to consider; and Quintus Curtius did not show more nerve and hardihood in riding into that crack in the ground of the Roman Forum than I did in stoutly bending me to the task of quieting Sammy. I may safely say, that in the wild and fearful struggle which followed, all the resources of an active mind, a vigorous and healthy body (masculine), an excellent disposition, were nobly devoted to the work, and if I failed, it was in an attempt beyond the powers of any mere man.
I picked Sammy up, in the first place, and carried him to the window, jumbling him up and down as I went, and aiming to divert his mind by action and by speech.
"Poor itty fella! Was ee tired seepin in his tadle? Did ee want to tum and see old cock-a-doodle-do and all ee biddy hens? Da, see um! Urk, urk, u-r-r-r-k, a-chackle, chackle, chackle. Ducky go quack, quack! (shriek continued; nurse tries other class of impressions, and jumps him vigorously up and down, accompanied with a noise similar to the following.) Ha ti deedle deedle deedle deedle dum dum dum tiddy I, tiddy I,
 widdlety widdlety widdlety widdlety quee quee quee quee, poor ittle fella, ha ha ha!"
"Full well I laughed, with counterfeited glee,"
 hoping that a genial sympathy might create a smile upon the "open countenance" of Sammy. Vain hope! All my jumbling only served to modify that surprising and steady yell by introducing a kind of pulsation or measured emphasis into it. My words might as well have been uttered to a drunken Sixth Warder in a row at the polls; and my hollow merriment, although its merits as an imitation did in fact make the baby stop a moment, catch breath, and look up at me, did no more. His face curled up again, and out came the yell.
I had observed, upon lifting Sammy from the cradle, that he seemed to stiffen himself in a somewhat writhen attitude, as if to resist my purpose. He now began to squirm and wriggle in a rather alarming manner, so that I fancied he might be about to indulge in the pleasing diversion of a fit. All at once I reflected that he must be hungry; and that very possibly both screeching and squirming might be referred to that cause. I accordingly placed the little one, still indefatigably howling in a manner that would have exhausted a Mohawk war-chief in three minutes, in his cradle, raked some live coals out from the buried kitchen fire, warmed some (cow's) milk in an old tin cup, watered it and sugared it according to the regulations in such case made and provided, put it in the "suck-bottle"—as I believe it is called—took a small precautionary pull at the preparation myself, found it a perfect nectar for luke-warmness, washiness, and sweetness, and proceeded to invite Master Sammy to partake, so to speak, of the festive bowl.
Lying yelling on his back, with eyes close shut and mouth wide open, he heeded not the approach of the seductive viand. I half lifted him up, but he wouldn't look. I jerked some drops into his mouth, as they "job" peppered vinegar or tomato catsup through a quill in the cruet-cork at eating-houses; but he appeared not to perceive it. I cautiously inserted the bottle into his mouth, until the tip of the sucking thing, whatever they call it, fairly poked open his epiglottis. He only gagged, writhed, and yelled on. Evidently he was not hungry; I put away the bottle.
The business grew dreadful; Sammy began to turn purple, and I to feel blue; but still he continued that wonderful and ear-torturing cry. I looked about me in forlorn and hopeless perplexity. There was a rattle—one of these coral things with half a dozen minute pewter sleigh-bells on it—and a penny whistle; I shook the former and blew the latter, in an industrious but rather imbecile way, near Sammy's phiz. I might as well have used the same means to scare a lioness robbed of her whelps, or a New York city alderman nosing-out a job. I lifted the infant, who stiffened himself again at my touch almost into a stony are, and shivered as a dying fish will sometimes do in the captor's hand, and with a feeble effort to preserve further the benignity and universal friendship which I had flourished so largely, and which I felt momentarily growing thinner and thinner, I sang to the child the inevitable "By-lo baby bunting," and then "Now I lay me," also the affecting ballad of Three Little Kittens, and as my stock of strictly juvenile literature gave out at this point, I proceeded with "Rise my soul," and one or two other hymns. These efforts were all in vain; I felt as sheepish as if I had been caught trying to sing a tornado to sleep; and my voice died away as I tried once more to raise the square-built strains of old Amsterdam, like those of "the monk, her son, and her daughter, the nun,"
 around the coffin of the wicked old woman of Berkeley, "in a quaver of consternation."
It was at this point that my long-tried patience utterly failed; and with a sudden revulsion of wrath, I felt myself, mentally speaking, slung round into a position of absolute opposition to this terrific child; of positive anger and spite, not entirely unmingled with fear. I perfectly recollect that precisely as I was feeling myself carried away by this impulse, Sammy, who lay in a stiffish attitude, with his head well back over one arm, opened his eyes a moment. As I am a living man, the pestilent infant WINKED HIS LEFT EYE AT ME! Never tell me there wasn't a devil in that baby!
Well; it occurred to me in this new frame of mind, that possibly I might intimidate the child, or simply out-yell and overwhelm it by sheer superiority of vociferation. So I held him up by both arms on my knee, looked right down his little, ugly, red throat, and gave him "A wet sheet and a flowing sea," in a style that would have electrified the whole British navy. It didn't discourage him at all. I tried the Pirate's Glee, containing some fearful chromatic whining, which I made the most of; but to no end. Then I degenerated, I am afraid, into mere mindless, ignoble spitefulness; and opening my mouth again I spent from ten to fifteen minutes in series of the most hideous, complicated, and disgusting yells that probably it ever entered into the heart of man to conceive, until my throat felt as if I had had a peck of teazles poked into my lungs and then pulled out again. Great Caesar's ghost! what a baby! He never flinched, nor "bated a jot of heart or hope;" he yelled away as peacefully as if nothing had happened.
But as for me, this finished me. I fancied that, under these frightful discouragements, my intellect was beginning slightly to waver. King Herod came into my mind. I thought of the great bed of live coals in the old-fashioned kitchen fire-place. Not altogether free from uneasiness as to what I might be led to do, I put Sammy into his cradle, and shut the kitchen door. Then I walked up and down the room a while, casting looks full of sneers, fury, and contempt at the unterrified and still shrieking child. Then I stationed myself at the foot of the cradle, and delivered a long and savage invective at Sammy, as Cicero used to at his enemies—when they were out of the way—shaking my fist at him, stringing reproachful epithets together by the score, and attributing to the little wretch an early and mature degradation of character that would have satisfied the toughest of the old New England Predestinarian Calvinists.
But I quickly grew ashamed of this. Dignified indifference, I remembered, would suit me better. Besides, I recollected having heard that letting babies alone would stop their crying when every thing else failed. I think it would—when they had yelled themselves to death. So I erected a sort of little fortification in the middle of the floor, of pillows and blankets, ensconced Sammy within it, stuck his rattle in his hand, took my "Dwight's Theology," and sat down again by the window to read. The first passage upon which my eye fell was within a page of that which I had been reading when these horrors began; and, like it, it seemed to hear an indistinct but decided relation to my case. It was this:
"To escape from our present melancholy, stormy, bloody world, to such a state, would be to quit, for a palace of splendor and delight, the gloom of a vault, hung round with midnight, and peopled with corpses; a bedlam, where the eye of frenzy flashed, the tongue vibrated with malice, and
 chains clanked, in dreadful concert, to rage and blasphemy; a dungeons haunted with crimes, teeming with curses, filled with fiends in the human shape, and opening its doors only to the gibbet and the grave."
"Aha, my boy!" I involuntarily exclaimed to Sammy. "Fiends in human shape, eh? How'll you like 
that
 place?" And I shook my fist at him. He paid no regard either to my remark or my fist.
I read on; but perplexed, wearied, and excited as I was, and with that wild alarm ever sounding in my ears, the forms upon the printed page made no impression upon my sensorium, and I turned over leaf after leaf in utter ignorance of what I read.
I had no perception of the duration of time. For what I know, Sammy squalled there a week. Once, with a grim smile, I started up, and emptied about half the milk out of the bottle, that I might permit it to be supposed he had fed to that extent. I had also mind enough left to shape a scheme of equivocation wherewith to elude the necessity of confessing the facts of the morning to my respected aunt. Otherwise, the period which supervened is a miserable blank in my recollection—nothing more, except a yell.
It was at some time in the distant future—as regards my reading of that ominous delineation of the abodes of the wicked—that the sudden noise of stamping feet, rattling wheels, and mingled voices smote upon my ear, and awakened me from a kind of awful stupor. Before I had composed my countenance my Aunt Fanny entered the room, glanced at her vociferous progeny, and bent a keen and suspicious look upon me. I fairly cowered before her—an abject thing—as miserable as if I had been taken in the act of stealing sheep from my best friend. I know my face was flushed, I know I had a hang-dog look; and I felt, to use a certain figurative expression, "like a boiled owl."
"Well, Fred," said she, in her sharp, decisive, incisive voice, "how did you get along?"
"Well," I said, feebly, "pretty well, on the whole. He cried some latterly. But, on the whole, I think he enjoyed himself."
Did I lie? I don't care much if I did. But I think he did enjoy himself.
As the people came trooping in, Sammy was apparently diverted by the noise, and "ceased firing." That is, his devil went out of him, because there was no futher chance to torment me. He was very soon in the enjoyment of his stated means of support, and seemed to appreciate them fully.
"Rather hungry," said my Aunt Fanny, when he had been dining strenuously for about half an hour, and looking queerly at me.
"I'm sure," I answered, "I gave him quite a lot of milk. It's half gone, at least."
No lie 
there
. I 
did
 give him quite a lot—quite a 
small
 lot. But I have always labored under the impression that my Aunt Fanny suspected that the proceedings had been a little irregular that morning. I let her think so. I didn't care to press the subject much.
I've speculated often upon the causes of that failure of mine, for it was a failure. I did every thing right; why— But I invariably fall back upon my theory of demoniacal possession. No other solution is possible.
I've formed some few conclusions upon this subject.
I don't think children like me much.
I think that the Fall of Man consisted in the becoming liable to be born, and to struggle up to maturity through the horrors of infancy. In the paradisiacal state we should all have merely come into existence, at eighteen for women and twenty for men, together with a good common school education.
I often ask, with Dr. Franklin, "What's the use of a baby?" He gave no answer; I do. A baby is providentially provided as an "awful example" for the warning of maids and bachelors, as terrific consequences universally follow great follies. It is the delirium tremens of matrimony. If you don't want to have it, let the causes alone.
Mother Ann Lee is your only true prophet. I intend to join the Shakers. I have already secured a broad-brimmed hat, and a coat of butternut brown I can naturally sing through my nose and shake my paws about.
AN IMPROMPTU HEN-ROOST.—A Methodist minister out West was invited to take tea by a member of his circuit.
The food consisted of cake made of Indian meal.
When the elder opened his slice, he noticed some feathers in it.
"It seems to me, sister," said he, "that your Johnny-cake is feathering out."
"There," the hostess replied, "I told my husband the other day that he must either get a cover for the meal barrel or remove the hen-roost."
NO DANGER.—Cooke, the actor, while once delighting the Scotch with his inimitable performance, and the night being very hot, and the tragedian having acted his best, toward the close of the evening felt not a little fatigued. The manager perceived this, and between the scenes he took the actor into his dressing-room, and unlocking a cupboard, selected a small thistle glass, and filling it with whiskey, said, "Here, Maister Cooke, I dinna think 'twill hurt ye." "No," said George, glancing at the size of the glass, "no, my friend, not if it were vitriol."
COOLNESS.—A few days since one of our popular attorneys called upon another brother of the profession and asked his opinion upon a certain point of law. The lawyer to whom the question was addressed drew himself up, and said, "I generally get paid for telling what I know!" The questioner drew a half-dollar from his waistcoat pocket, handed it to the other, and coolly remarked: "Tell me all you know, and give me the change."
The enterprising vagabond who is organizing a brass band of twenty women says that, if they learn half as many "airs" as they put on, the experiment cannot fail to be a success.
The Danbury News
 says: Here are Miss Anthony and others of her ilk skiltering about the country, and eggs are forty cents a dozen.
INTERPRETATION OF A WILL.—A very rich merchant, who had an only son, made his will, by which he left all his property, amounting to three hundred thousand francs, to some monks, who were to give his son such a sum as they wished. After the death of the merchant, the monks took possession of all the money without offering any of it to the son. The son being displeased at this, brought the monks before the viceroy. The viceroy, having read the will, asked them what sum of money they wished to give the son. They answered:
"Six thousand francs."
"And what then do you wish to do with the rest?" asked the viceroy.
"We wish to keep that," they said, "because it is ours by right?"
"But you do not understand the will properly," said the viceroy, "for it says that you are to give the sum 
you
 wish. The six thousand francs are therefore yours, and the rest belongs to the son."
With this decision the monks had to be satisfied. Thus, in trying to get all, they lost nearly all. There was no release from the viceroy's decision. Crying was of no use; they had to submit.
A REBUKE.—It is related that at a State dinner given in Washington, at which the principal foreign ministers, with a sprinkling of prominent Senators and representatives of the State Department attended, the decorum that for a while prevailed was rudely disturbed by a very ill-timed question propounded to the Spanish Minister, who was present, by a certain well-known Senator.
"Senor Tassara," said our Senator, "when are you going to sell us Cuba?"
The elegant representative of Spanish chivalry "smiling, put the question by" in this wise:
"Mr. —, when you are President of the United States and I am Prime Minister of Spain, we will, with your permission, discuss that question."
The rebuke was terrible, when the formal, almost solemn character of the dinner and Spain's sensitiveness relative to the Cuban question are considered; but, although its full force was perceptible to the majority of the guests, the Senator from — went on, with the impassiveness of Charlotte at the sight of werther's dead body, munching his Gruyere cheese.
SOME years ago a singular method was adopted by a "city man" in London for securing distinguished guests. He requested the honor of the Duke of Wellington's company to meet Marshal Soult, and that of Marshal Soult to meet the Duke of Wellington, although unacquainted with either of them, for he knew that both of these illustrious warriors were so fond of "fighting their battles o'er again" with one another that they were sure to accept. And then he invited people to meet Marshal Soult and the Duke of Wellington.
A CONDUCTOR on the pennsylvania Railroad telegraphed from Derry station recently: "Train delayed fifteen minutes on account of a lady. don't know whether it is a boy or a girl."
MARK TWAIN tenders the following advice to serenaders:—"Don't stand right under the porch and howl, but get out in the middle of the street, or better still, on the other side of it. Distance lends enchantment to the sound. * * * Don't let your screaming tenor soar an octave above all the balance of the chorus, and remain there, setting everybody's teeth on edge for blocks around; and above all, don't let him sing a solo; probably there is nothing in the world so suggestive of serene contentment and perfect bliss, as the spectacle of a calf chewing a dish-rag; but the nearest approach to it is your reedy tenor, standing apart, in sickly attitude, with head thrown back, and eyes uplifted to the moon, piping his distressing solo. Now do not pass lightly over this matter, friend, but ponder it with that seriousness which its importance entitles it to. * * * As soon as you start, gag your tenor, otherwise he will be letting off a screech every now and then, to let the people know he is around. Your amateur tenor is notoriously the most self-conceited of all God's creatures."
The following anecdote is related of CHARLES LEVER by a writer in 
Tinsley's Magazine
:
Though Lever's fascinating manners made him one of the most popular of men, he could sometimes say a bitter thing. It is well known that the late Archbishop Whately was remarkably susceptible to flattery. One morning at Redesdale, near Stillorgan, Dublin, His Grace received a number of guests, including a large proportion of the expectant clergy, who paid profound court to the ex-Fellow of Oriel. While walking through the grounds, Dr. Whately plucked a leaf, which he declared had a most nauseous flavor. "Taste it," said he, handing it to one of the acolytes. The latter blandly obeyed, and then, with a wry face, subscribed to the botanical orthodoxy of his master. "Taste it," said the grateful prelate, handing the leaf to Lever. "Thank Your Grace," said the latter, as he declined it, "my brother is not in Your Lordship's diocese."
THE following scene, it is said, took place in a Parisian 
Magasin
. An elegantly dressed lady asked to see some materials for paletots. The shopman mounted the steps, and took down several pieces of striped velvet.
"The rain would spoil it," said the lady, "Show me some swanskin."
Several pieces being laid upon the counter:
"Too thick," said the lady, after an examination to ten minutes; "show me some lady's cloth."
Several great rolls were laid before her. They were too thin. Then came velvet, silk, satin, moire, until the counter disappeared under the piles of stuffs behind which stood the nearly invisible shopman, still patient and polite. At last:
"I have decided," said the customer, "in favor of flannel—blue flannel."
Ten or twelve pieces were placed upon the heap.
"That will do," she said, after a long and minute scrutiny. "How much will it take to make a dog's paletot?" and she held up a microscopic toy terrier.
"A paletot?" asked the shopman, not at all disconcerted, and appearing to make a mental calculation. "With pockets, madame?"
A CONSCIENTIOUS DEACON.—Many years ago a church was built in Brandon, and the deacon was employed to do some part of the work—building the pulpit, if I remember. He wanted a hundred and fifty dollars, while the committee wished it done for a hundred. At last it was settled between him and the chairman, a shrewd lawyer and something of a wag, that a hundred dollars should be the price; but if, on the completion of the job, the deacon said that he had "an all-fired hard bargain," he should be paid twenty-five dollars more.
The good deacon found that he had lost by the job, and claimed the additional five and twenty dollars.
"Well, deacon," asked the lawyer, "can you honestly say you had an all-fired hard bargain?"
"Yes, I have had an awful hard bargain."
"But can you say you have had an all-fired hard bargain?"
"Yes, it was a tremendous hard bargain."
"But that is not according to agreement. Will you say you have had an all-fired hard bargain?"
"No, squire, I can't say that. That would be swearing, and I won't swear for any money; but it was a most outrageous hard bargain."
"Then I don't see, Deacon Spooner, how we can, under the agreement, pay you the twenty-five dollars."
The deacon left, preferring to lose his money rather than violate his conscience by saying "all-fired." But the upshot was that after the lawyer had enjoyed the telling of the joke for a few days, he paid the sum. So the good deacon saved his conscience and did not lose his money.
A SHARP FARMER.—An honest old Pennsylvania farmer had a tree on his premises he wanted cut down, but being weak in the back, and having a dull axe, he hit upon the following plan: Knowing the passion among his neighbors for coon hunting he made a coon's foot out of a potato and proceeded to imprint numerous tracks to and up the tree. When all ready he informed the neighbors that the tree must be filled with coons, pointing to the external evidence made with his potato foot. The bait took, and in a short time half a dozen fellows, with sharp axes, were chopping at the base of the tree, each taking his regular turn. The party also brought dogs and shot-guns, and were in ecstacies over the anticipated haul of fat coons. The tree finally fell, but not a coon was seen to "drop."
"I HAD more money than he had to carry on the suit," said a very mean individual who had just won a lawsuit over a poor neighbor; "and that's where I had the advantage of him. Then I had much better counsel than he, and there I had the advantage of him. And his family were sick while the suit was pending, so he couldn't attend to it, and there I had the advantage of him again. But then Brown is a very decent sort of a man after all." "Yes." said his listener, "and there's where he has the advantage of you."
VOLTAIRE once praised another writer very heartily to a third person. "It is very strange," was the reply, "that you speak so well of him, for he says you are a charlatan." "Oh," replied Voltaire, "I think it very likely that both of us are mistaken."
BRITZER HIS OWN DETECTIVE
Old Jacob Britzer kept the village store in Bucksport. We say the village store because it was the largest, and, in fact, the only store of any consequence in the place. Like all country storekeepers, Jacob kept for sale dry and moist goods of every description, and both village and suburban gossips made his place their centre and tilting ground. To this the trader did not object, because he was himself of a social turn and because these hangers-on were all customers. Occasionally Jacob missed certain articles from his shelves and counters which he knew had not been sold and he could only imagine that they had been stolen. This thing continued for more than a year, and Britzer with all his careful watching was unable to detect the thief. There were several whom he deemed capable of the deed, but he could not fix the crime upon any of them.
At length one Monday morning, Jacob Britzer entered the store, and on removing the heavy wooden shutters from the front windows he discovered that the large glass top show case near the main entrance had been robbed of nearly all its contents. At least three hundred dollar's worth of fancy goods had been stolen, a large amount for the country storekeeper to lose. Jacob had locked up his store on Saturday night, and had not visited it since, nor had the keys been out of his keeping. For a brief space he was thunder-struck, then for another brief space he collected his thoughts and reflected. His course of action was resolved upon. His first decided movement was to lock the door by which he had entered, and draw the curtains over the windows. Next he replenished the showcase from a fresh stock which he chanced to have on hand, making it look so nearly as it looked on Saturday evening that not even his clerk was likely to detect any change. Thus the matter, so far as he and his store were concerned, was locked in his own breast, and so he meant to keep it. Having ascertained that the thief had gained entrance by a rear cellar window, and having so covered the tracks of the guilty one that his clerk would not observe them, he opened his store and prepared for business. Half an hour later the clerk came, and detected nothing out of the way. (This clerk, we may remark, was Jacob's own son).
The day passed, customers came and went as usual, the gossips chatted over their beer and cheese, while old Jacob was attentive and affable, never betraying by word or sign that anything had happened amiss. In the evening Peter Hawks came in. This Peter Hawks was a farmer, owning quite a place near the outskirts of the village, who had of late been leading a life rather aimless and thriftless. It had been Peter's custom to spend a good part of the day in the store, but on this Monday he had not put in an appearance until after tea, and even when he did come he failed to talk with his usual volubility, but remained for the most part silent, watching what others had to say.
At length the hour grew late, and one by one the gossips dropped away until Peter was left alone with Jacob and his son. The solitary auctioneer arose from his chair, and after a little previous hesitation he approached the storekeeper with—
"Ah, Jacob, that was quite a loss you met with. Have ye any idee who did it?"
"Who did what!" asked Jacob, dropping the piece of cloth which he was folding and looking up.
"Who robbed yer showcase last night?"
"Yes," answered Jacob, with stern promptness; "I know exactly who did it."
"Eh, who?"
"You did it!"
"Me!" gasped Peter, quiveringly.
"Ay—you did it. I know you did it; and thus far the secret is entirely between you and me. You are the only other living man besides myself who knows that I have been robbed at all!"
And then Jacob went on to explain to his customer how he had managed to detect the thief. Peter Hawks was forced to own up, and in consideration of his returning the goods last stolen and paying for those stolen on previous occasions, and also promising to steal no more, he was let off. But he did not remain much longer in Bucksport, Having settled with Jacob Britzer, he made all haste to sell his farm and remove to parts where the story of his shortcomings was not known.
A MORMON FUNERAL.
Mrs. Stenhouse, in her lecture on Mormon life, told the funny story of Sister Picknel's funeral. The following was Bishop Hardy's sermon:
"Wal, bruthrun and sisters, you are all here, I s'pose, and so we'll begin. Wal, our sister is dead; let her rest. Our sister has suffered and made others suffer, but now she is dead we'll let her rest. She opened the doors to the devils and let them iu five years ago, when her husband took his young wife. I told her then they would kill her if she did not take care, and now they've done it. She was a torment to her husband, and I guess if he'd a know'd that she'd a bin such a torment he'd never married her. Ain't that so, Brother Picknel?"
"That's so Bishop."
"Wal, Brother Picknel, have you got anything to say?"
"Not as I know's on, but I s'pose I ought ter say sum'at, and if I do I shall be sure to offend sum o' the sisters, so I s'pose we'd better close the meetin'."
This ended the funeral service.
A STRANGER stepped into a North Adams, Mass., restaurant the other day and ordered a plate of beans. On finishing his lunch he asked the price. "Thirty cents," replied the host, thinking that he had a customer from whom he could make a few extra cents. "Isn't that a devil of a price for beans?" asked the stranger. Failing to get a reduction he paid the bill and left. The next day the saloon keeper received a telegram, the charge on which was thirty cents. On being opened, it was found to contain neither date nor signature, but only the words: "Isn't that a devil of a price for beans?"
The 
Appeal
 tells of a Memphis lady who wrote to a New York matrimonial agent for a husband. The Agent transferred the letter to a crusty old bachelor, who, in replying to it accidently substituted for his own photograph that of a pet orang-outang. The lady answered: "There is certainly not much personal beauty about you, but you appear to have an honest manly face. I accept."
THE subject of impression at first sight was being talked over, on Christmas Eve, in a family-circle of speculative christians, when the female head of the family said:
"I always form an idea of a person on first sight, and generally find it correct."
"Mamma," said her youthful son.
"Well, my dear what is it?"
"I want to know your opinion of me was when you first saw me."
The lady did not come up to the necessity of the occasion, and the question is traveling about unanswered.
A PENNSYLVANIA school-boy last week accomplished the unique feat of getting a billiard-ball in his mouth, which so entirely filled the cavity that he couldn't get a bawl out until the doctor held it by a lucky hazard.
THE man who wrote this has been scratched to death:—"When a woman gets a letter she carries it in her hand, but a couple of pounds of sausage she manages to squeeze into her pocket."
Mrs. Jones says her husband is a three-handed man—right hand, left hand, and a little behind hand.
THE 
World
 says: Cheese factories are springing up all over Minnesota; being the only things that have a curd there lately.
The happy medium—Gentleman between two ladies.
